CHAPTER I.
On
a mid-summer's evening so long ago as the year 1803, a King's Yacht
was laying at anchor in the river Thames, a cable's length below the tower of
London. The twilight was still early, the glow of sunset yet diffusing a rich
blush over the warm, hazy skies. The confused hum of the vast city rolled
over the water mingled with the deep tones of a bell from some distant tower.
A thin, dreamy-looking mist enveloped like a veil of gauze the thousand masts
that densely crowded the piers, and half-obscured the spires and turrets
scarce less numerous. Above the place where the yacht lay, there stretched,
in majestic arches, the series of noble bridges that span the Thames, their
avenues thronged with multitudes passing and repassing on foot and in
carriges
.
The sound of feet and wheels in their ceaseless passage fell upon the
ear louder than the roar of the opposed current of the river, as it rushed like
the rapids of a mountain stream between the strong arches beneath.
An officer pacing the quarter deck of the yacht seemed too much absorbed
in his own meditations to regard these features of the scene by which he was
surrounded. He was a man about thirty-nine years of age, wearing the
undress
uniform of a first lieutenant in the British naval service. He was tall in
stature and well made, with an air of high birth. He was walking very
slowly
and thoughtfully up and down the starboard side of the snow-white deck.
At times he would by degrees relax his pace and then stop altogether, as if
buried so deeply in his thoughts as to be unconscious of the motions of his
body. At such times his lips would be severely and closely compressed, his
dark-gray eye would look black beneath the scowl of his contracting brows,
and nervously clenching his fingers in the palm of his hand would give
utterance
to a suppressed groan of exquisite suffering. Then recalled to the
recollection
of himself, by the sound he would start abrubtly to resume his walk,
and for a few moments pace fore and aft with a quick stern troubled tread.
The yacht was one of the most beautiful craft that ever sat upon the water.
She was about one hundred and eighty tons burden, and constructed with an
eye to the most perfect symmetry, as well as speed in sailing. She carried
six brass long eighteens, and fifty men stationed and quartered as in ships in
the service. Her officers consisted of a captain, two junior lieutenants and
three midshipmenmere lads. The captain was so styled in courtesy, though
his rank was only that of a first lieutenant; but his connection with a branch
of the royal family had conferred upon him this favored command and the title
of course followed the temporary promotion.
The officers, save the Captain, were now in the cabin at supper, and the
men forward idly gazing on the shores, or watching the craft in the river, or
spinning to each other, with all the superstitious awe of English tars, fearful
tales of deeds done in `The Tower,' the black and menacing towers of which
flung their gloomy shadows far over the deck of the yacht. The yards of
this vessel were squared and her sails furled with the nicest precision. She
was a schooner-brig, being a brig only forward. Her appearance upon the
water
was at once elegant and rakish. Her long slender masts inclined so far
over her stern, that her silken pennon, when there was no wind to blow it out,
hung perpendicularly down far beyond her davits. The yards were like
pencils
and her royal masts were so long and delicately tapering that they bent
and swayed with gracetul elasticity at the gentle force with which a light wind
was now pressing upon them. The masts and spars were of a polished black
hue, and nothing to a seaman's eye could be more beautiful than the finished
and nautical-like arrangement of her standing and running rigging. Not a
rope was out of place, not a lift or halyard that was not in its place. As the
yacht was built for pleasure, to convey the Royal party only to the mouth of
the Thames, and sometimes, in sunny weather round to Portsmouth, and even
to the Isle of Wight, she was not very deep, but sat as lightly and gracefully
upon the water as a swan. Her hull was perfectly black save a scarlet line
running along the top of her bul warks fore and aft. All her appointments
were of the highest order. Ornmament and use were tastefully united in her
internal arrangements, and the richness and splendor of her cabins were truly
royal. The seamen were picked men and wore a peculiar nautical uniform,
neat and appropriate.
This beautiful warlike looking yacht as she rode proudly at her anchor, amid
the river-craft, which had hove short, or veered out more cable to give her a
large space, seemed like a queen among her vassals. She had been laying
there, this was the third day, and with that mystery which always envelopes
whatever belongs to Royalty, had held no communication with other vessels,
nor given any clue towards gratifying the curiosity of those who were
conjecturing
what her business could be lying so long and perseveringly opposite
the Tower.
The officer upon her deck after a few more hurried turns during which his
fine face, (for his features were noble and handsome though strangely
distorted
now by inward emotions and passions,) suddenly stopped as a young
midshipman
appeared upon deck, and cried, sternly,
`Lower away third cutter!'
`Aye, aye, sir,' answered the reefer, who was a fine looking little scion of
nobility, in a very handsome uniform and brown hair curling profusely over
his shoulders. `Third cutter away!'
The boatswain's whistle piped shrilly the call to the crew of the cutter, and
in two minutes the boat was in the water under the starboard gangway,
awaiting
the captain; for such was the rank of the person who had given the order.
Side-boys lined the gangway awaiting him, while `the reefer' had delibe rately
taken his place in the boat as coxswain.
`My lord,' said the captain to the midshipman, `I shall take the coxswain
with me!'
The youth, with a disappointed look, reascended the gangway and the
captain
of the yacht entered the cutter and took his seat upon the crimson velvet
cushions in the stern, and, wrapped in his cloak, sat in silence.
`Let fall and give way!' cried the coxswain; and the cutter pulled swiftly
from the side of the vessel and steered in the direction of the Tower stairs, over
which the shades of night were now thickly gathering.
`What in the deuce is the matter with the skipper of late?' exclaimed young
Percy in inimitable ill-humor, as he followed the cutter in its progress with his
eyes. `Dauling is getting savage. I meant to have gone ashore and had a
guinea's worth of the opera to night, but instead of that I have got to
entertain
myself with listening to the howling of dogs from the shore, and watching
the dancing of the waters under the counter! What has got into the captain
of late, Barron?'
`That is impossible to tell;' answered a young mid a year older than Percy,
with a dark Italian face and features of great beauty, yet resolute and minly.
`He hasn't been the same man the last two days! He looks as black as the
old donjon of the Tower there, and it's about as safe to go near the one as the
other. The truth is, Fred, I had a curiosity to see what becomes of him at
night when he goes ashore, and meant to have kept an eye on his steps.
Something
is in the wind!'
`Perhaps he has incurred the King's displeasure,' answered Alfred Barron.
`Dauling wouldn't care much for that. He doesn't love his Majesty much;
but that's between you and me!'
`And yet the King appointed him to this yacht. His Majesty cant suspect
his hostility to him!'
`I dont think he does. Yet I shouldn't be surprised if he had been shewing
it some way, and it is the fear of losing by it that vexes him. For it was after
his return from the palace two days ago he began to look so confoundedly
black! Something's to windward and he feels ugly!'
`There is no doubt a weight is on his mind. He has eaten nothing to day;
and all he has done is to pace up and down the starboard side of the quarter
deck like a chained lion.'
`See! the cutter does not land at the Tower stairs, but is pulling up along
the shipping to the upper pier-stairs. Well, let him go so I cant go with
him!'
`Do you know what we are laying here for, Percy?'
`No, answered the reefer, as he took an impatient turn across the decks.
`Perhaps to take the queen and the small ones to a sea-airing.'
`It is my opinion we are to perform quite a different service. We dont
usually
wait for her Majesty off the Tower. If we had been going to take any of
the Royal family on a pleasure-trip to the mouth of the Thames, we should
have pulled higher up and lay off St. James' stairs. I think,' he added in a low
voice, `I think we are waiting for a state prisoner!'
`Who?'
`That I cannot tell!'
`It may be so. We shall know soon, as we are hove short, and ready for a
moment's move!'
`Can you see the cutter now?'
`No. It is lost in the darkness and confusion of the crowd of river-craft.
We shall know all in good time I dare say, what we are here for. Here comes
the first luff out of the cabin, with a Spaniard in his mouth. Let us imitate
his example as becomes modest reefers!'
Thus speaking the juvenile nobleman of seventeen took two cigars from a
silver box he carried in a fob made for its reception, and presenting one to
Barron lighted the other with an ingenious apparatus contained in a
compartment
of the cigar-case.
The two young men then walked aft, and seating themselves very
comfortably
upon the taffrail proceeded to smoke their fragrant Habaneros with the
appearance of great personal enjoyment.
When the cutter, after quitting the vessel, had got within twenty fathom of
the Tower stairs where it had hitherto been accustomed to land the
commander
of the Royal yacht, he roused himself from his thoughts and looking round
said sternly,
`Not there! steer the boat to the St. James stairs.'
The coxswain obeyed and the cutter, instead of continuing on towards the
Tower, the base of which lay in dark shadows, began to ascend the river
parallel
with the shore. The river bank was lined with shipping and bordered
with houses closely crowded together, with here and there the narrow opening
of a s reet leading into the heart of the metropolis. The lamps were already
lighted, and as the cutter shot by one street after another, momentary glimpses
were obtained of the long double lines of lamps with fine effect. The
numerous
wherries, skiffs and other boats which filled the river, crossing it in every
direction; the noise of so many bodies rushing swiftly through the water; the
occasional song of a wherry-man rising clear on the calm evening air, for the
wind had now gone entirely down; the `heave-ho-yeo,' of seamen getting their
anchors; the roar of wheels thundering with ceaseless reverberations over the
pavements of the city; the shouting of men to one another; and an
alarum
of
fire in the distance with the wild glow of a conflagration lighting up of the
horizon, were the features of the scene and of the moment as the cutter kept
her way steadily along through the mazes of the thronged mart.
Without heeding any of these things the commander, after giving the brief
order to the coxswain to change the course of the boat, resumed his former
silence, from which he was only aroused by the cutter's bows touching the foot
of St. Jame's stairs. Rising up he sprung to the shore.
`Return to the yacht and come for me at twelve o'clock,' he said half
turning
round to give the order. He then rapidly ascended the stairs, and the
next moment was traversing at a rapid step one of the dark dingy thoroughfares
that lead from that quarter of London to the west part of the city.
He kept on his way enveloped to the mouth in his cloak, and with his cap,
which was an ordinary French travelling-cap, pulled down over his eyes as if
to escape recognition. On reaching the extremity of the lane up which he
had come, he did not turn to the right into the wide and spacious avenue
which led towards the better part of the town, but deviated to the left, taking
a close, crooked street which seemed to wind through the very heart of the
oldest and most obscure portion of the metropolis. As he advanced along this
tortuous thoroughfare his step was quicker and his arm moved beneath his
cloak as if he was grasping the hilt of a short dagger. The place was by no
means calculated to increase the confidence of one passing through it. The
houses on either side were very high and seemed to be crowded with teuants
like a bee-hive, though without the bee's industry; for all seemed to be steeped
in poverty, and idle and vicious. The lower stories were converted into
miserable stalls and drinking-taps, the doors of which were thronged with a
motley set of both sexes, who seemed congregated around them for no other
object than to quarrel and cause confusion. Police officers were seen at
intervals
slowly promenading the side-walks, but their familiar presence there
scarce seemed to check the confusion of oaths, obscenity and drunken
laughter
!
It was with difficulty the commander of the yacht kept his way without
contact
with these filthy crews,from whom,if he jostled any one by chance,he
received
the fiercest execrations. He, however, continued his course with a firm,
prompt tread, di regarding their menaces, yet with an eye and hand ready to
discern and guard against any ruffianly attack.
At length he reached the end of this vile thoroughfare and passed by
turnin
to the right into one that was a little wider but scarcely of better
appearance
.
Its aspect and features, however, were different. The side-walks on
both sides were lined with rows of shops dimly lighted. The windows and
the inside of the doors were hung with every possible variety of cast-off
clothing
from a rich court-suit down to a poor scrivener's thread-bare black coat.
Chapeaus and round hats, military caps and even swords and pistols were
displayed
upon the shelves. The interiors were filled with articles of wardrobe,
and behind each counter could be seen old men with dark visages, arched
eye-brows, large black eyes, high aqueline noses, generally mounted with a
pair of iron-rimined spectacles. They were Jews, and this street was the
quarter where they did business not only in cast-off wardrobes, but also most
of them were money-dealers: for wretched as some of their shops and the
habitations above them for their families were, they were far richer than they
seemed, and many of them had thousands of pounds loaned at usurious
interest
to the merchant and the noble.
Tudor Dauling, for such was the name of the personage whose progress we
are now following, after entering this thoroughfare of the Jews slackened his
pace and kept his eyes scrutinizingly fixed on the smoky signs on the opposite
side of the way; for although the lamps of the street were far apart, and gave
but dim light to the dark pavements, yet the murky light from the farthing
candles in the shop windows enabled him to distinguish one sign from
another
,
though with some difficulty. He seemed to be endeavoring to ascertain
the location of some one of the tenants of the shop in particular, as if not
sufficiently familiar with the place to recognize its exterior. At length he
stopped and searchingly regarded the one opposite to him, he succeeded in
making out the half-obscured letters on the sign. It was `Enoch Moloch,
Jeweler and dealer in apparel.'
It was but five steps across the street to the sunken doorway of this
tenements
which was half shop, half habitation. The stories of the ancient row
of houses to which it belonged, rose one above the other to a great height
above the low door-way, of the ground story, which appeared to have been
pressed into the ground full four feet by the superincumbent weight of the
black mass of damp and mouldy bricks above it.
Over the door and the square window on the side, projected a sort of roof
or `stoope' which turned off the rain from the `old-clothes' which in the
daytime
hung from a hundred nails driven into the shutters and into the mortar
between
the corroding bricks. This projection was at a level lower than the
heads of the passengers, so that a person entering a shop would have to stoop
to avoid bringing his head in contact with it: and to get fairly within the shop
he would have to descend two steps. As it was now night, Enoch Moloch the
Jew had taken in or rather his two apprentices, black-eyed Israeliteish youths
of his own blood, had done it at his command, all the motley array of scarlet,
green and blue, gray, black and mixed garments that served to the passers-by
as an advertisement of the occupation of the keeper of the shop.
The neighbors of the Jew were all his brethren, dealers in the same
commodities
,
and the captain of the yacht as he crossed the street towards the
shop of Enoch saw them variously occupied in their stalls, some in smoking
huge German pipes, others in bargaining with customers, others standing in
their doors talking, and waiting for customers to come in and buy. In Enoch's
shop he could discern no one but a Jewish lad in a red cap who sat upon a
high stool smoking a short pipe, his black eyes shining like stars through the
clouds of tobacco in which he was enveloping his brown face.
As Dauling stooped and descended into this stall the lad jumped from his
elevated seat on which he was perched and, in a shrill voice, while he
bustlingly
displayed upon the short counter, a handsome, half-worn court-dress
which Enoch had no doubt bought at a bargain:
`Sheep sir at doo poun' sax shaylin'! worn birt'-day last, py te kreatest Dook
in te hoal kingtom! Puy it, sir! Jis' fit a nople shentleman like you as!'
`Where is the Jew?' demanded Captain Dauling with an impatient manner,
still keeping his features closely concealed as if fearful of being recognized
by any chance passer-by the door; though the dimness of the two yellowish
tallow candles that were stuck up in rusty iron-sockets in the shop, afforded
sufficient security.
`Fader!' cried the lad in a shrill octave directing his voice towards a
narrow
stair case, the door of which was half hid by hanging garments; `dere ish
a shentlemans in te shoop as don't want to puy nothin' put to see you!'
In answer to his call a young girl made her appearance, with fine Jewish
eyes, and an air of the most finished coquetry. She was not more than eighteen
but was tall and nobly formed. She wore a scarlet satin closely fitting her
finely developed bust, and affording by its bright cherry hue, a striking relief
to her jet black hair and nut-brown complexion. A necklace of rubies
sparkled
upon her beautifully mouldered neck, and on her bare arms were bracelets
the stones of which emitted the same rich crimson light. Her shoes which
were wonderfully small, were crimson and covered with spangles, and the
heels being full two inches in height, gave her, perhaps, a false height.
`My uncle desires to know what your business is, sir?' she said with a
searching investigation of her eyes, to discover the features that belonged to
the stately figure before her. She spoke in a richly-keyed flute-like tone that
fell upon the ear with delightful cadences; while her manner was at once
graceful and refined, while it partook, perhaps, something of independence
and pride of conscious beauty.
`I have been here once before, Mademoiselle Rachel! You do not seem to
recollect me,' answered the commander of the yacht in a voice that was
accompanied
by a slight smile. As he spoke he raised the visor of his cap.
`I will tell my uncle who it is,' she said, smiling with recognition and
assuming
an air of profound respect.
`But do you
know
, fair Jewess?' he demanded quickly.
`I know that you have been here before and that you are one of his friends!'
she answered with an emphasis on the last word.
`Yes, one of his
friends!
' be repeated in a tone of haughty contempt, as she
re-ascended the stair-way. `To do business with these money-dealers, one
must be content for the time being to stand on a level with them. Money
makes all upon an equality while we trade in it! Nay, it sometimes makes
slaves masters. The poor noble may sue to the rich Israelite, aye, fawn upon
him to handle his vile gold without which nobility were mockery! But I am
not troubled with nobility, though scarce a nobleman in England has such
blood flowing in his veins as '
Here the return of the Jewess interrupted his soliloquy.
`My uncle desires me to conduct you to him,' she said descending to the
shop and directing him with a gesture of her hand to mount the stairs, while
she drew aside a Scottish plaid that half-obscured the passage.
The captain of the yacht passed her slightly bowing in deference to her sex
and beauty, and aided by a glimmer of a light at the top of the flight, which
was both narrow and angular, he succeeded in reaching the landing, though
the planks bent beneath his heavy tread as he ascended.
On reaching this place she passed him, took up the lamp, which was a
curious
silver one, and leading the way along a sort of common hall, came to a
heavily made door at which she tapped with her fingers.
`Come in,' answered a deep voice in a strong Jewish accent.
The Jewess threw open the door and the captain passed in, the entrance
being immediately closed behind him upon the outside by his conductress.
CHAPTER II.
Moloch the Jew.
The
room into which the commander of the yacht was ushered by the
beautiful young Jewess was of a very different character from the other parts
of the interior of the dwelling already described. It was large and spacious,
and furnished with all the luxury of a nobleman's private chamber. Gold
mingled with crimson met the eye in the drapery of the windows and the
richest
colors covered the chairs and ottomans. The general style of the
room and its furniture was oriental rather than English. At a table
covered
with an embroidered scarlet cloth sat a man about fifty years of age
dressed in a lose black gown. A brazen antique lamp suspended above
the table cast its beams downward upon his majestic head and features. His
high, column-like forehead shaded with short, black locks; his strong arched
brows, and large, full, piercing black eyes; his high-bridged and slightly
arched nose, and the red fulness and flexibility of his lips betrayed him to
belong
to the tribe of Israel. A jet black beard mingled with gray descended
from his chin to his breast. His size was large and his air noble and imposing.
But there was an expression in his eyes of profound avarice, and about his
mouth played deceit and cunning. Physically the Jew was a noble specimen
of his finely formed race; but morally he looked in every lineament the usurer.
As the captain of the yacht entered he was busily summing up a column of
figures in a book before him. He did not look up from his occupation until
he heard the door close again and the step of the visiter advancing towards
him. He then raised his face from his accounts, keeping his forefinger upon
the column he had been calculating, and fixing his glance upon him said with
a strong Jewish accent,
`You are velcom, my lort. Pe pleesh to take a shair! So, you haf come
vor more monish?' he added, with a scarcely perceptible glimmer of
satisfaction
in the expression of his eyes.
`You seem to approach the subject abruptly enough, Moloch,' said Dauling
coloring, as if displeased at his business being so readily divined and declared
to him. `The truth is, it is more money I have come for! Nothing else, you
may be assured, would bring me into this infernal quarter.'
As he spoke he drew a high-back, crimson chair towards the table before
the Jew and placing his arms crossed upon the rich table-covering, he
regarded
him with a look of anxiety and painful uncertainty.
`You haf de shureties, my lort?' said the Jew with a grave aspect and
drawing
down one corner of his mouth in a peculiar and sinister manner.
`You well know I have not, Enoch!' answered Dauling with emphasis, all
the color leaving his cheeks.
`Then you vell knows dat I has not te moniesh,' responded the Jew coldly,
and without moving a muscle of his dark Arabian visage.
`I know that you
must
let me have money, sureties or no,' answered
Dauling
almost fiercely.
`Peace, my lort! Peace in a pargain is more petter nor war! You say you
haf want moneish, put you haf not de sureties; I say I vant te sureties for my
moneish.'
The officer remained a few moments silent, his hand upon his brow. His
face was dark and troubled. At length he spoke.
`I well knew, Jew, that I could not get money of you, nay not a farthing to
save my soul, without security. I was not so ignorant of the cold avarice of
thy own heart, or of thy race! Hear me what I have to say and then do as you
please; for, as I know you have no principle or conscience where gold is
concerned
,
I am assured what I am about to propose will meet your peculiar views
of things.'
`If, my lort can get te shureties dem ish all tat ish want,' answered Moloch
briefly, and bending his great eyes upon him to listen with them; for he heard
and understood more by the expression of the countenance than by the words
that fell upon his ear.
`You know well, Jew,' said Dauling, gloomily and hesitatingly, `that
have
no
further means!
There
,' he continued, pointing to an iron box at the
Jews feet and which he used as a foot-stool, `there is locked up and the key
is at thy girdle, the deed of the only estate I ever owned.'
`The gift of thy noble father the Duke,' said the Jew.
`Such gift as it was! a mere pittance of twenty thousand pounds! But were
it worth a hundred thousand it is no longer
mine!
'
`If shentlemen's vill play tey must expect to lose deir moneish,' answered
the Jew, with a twinkle of avaricious gains in the corner of his eye.
`I know well the risks of play, Moloch. You know I have suffered from
their effects. Cursed be the day I ever adventured the first guinea! But this
is past. I have now only to save myself from ruin.
`Ruin! Has my lort lost all his moneish?'
`I have not a sovereign left of the large sum you let me have when I called
to see you last June!'
`And no estate now?'
`Not an acre!'
`Tish very bat, very mootch bat,' answered Moloch with a sympathising
shake of his head, while a gleam of pleasure secretly passed across his
expression
.
`Bad! I am ruined, Jew, and
you
must save me,' cried Dauling with.
intense
excitement and placing his hand forcibly and earnestly upon the
moneylender's
wrist.
`My lort cannot pe ruined vile te Duke ish livin? He gif my lort a pretty
eshtate, ant if my lort tell him he must haf anudder, te Duke vill gif my lort
anodder pretty eshtate.'
`No. I have seen the Duke my father, Moloch. I have told him that I
was in need of money, but he refused to advance me!'
`Gid you tell te Duke you had mortgage your eshtate?' asked the Jew
quickly.
`Yes; but not to whom? I told him my whole situation and how that the
mad passion for gaming had step by step brought me to it. He answered me
that in giving me what he had, an education befitting my birth, illegitimate
though it was, and on my coming of age presenting me with a property worth
twenty thousand pounds, that he had done enough for a son who had no legal
claim upon him! This was his answer to me, Jew! Moreover, he said that
as his influence has obtained for me the command of the Royal yacht, with a
very handsome pay, that it was enough for him to do; and that I must now
depend
on my pay and my character as an officer for my future prospects in my
life!'
`This looksh vary bat,' said Moloch gravely; for he saw now that he had no
further prospect of getting any more gold and silver gains out of the gamester.
He spoke gravely and looked coldly and reserved. Dauling at once perceived
the change in his manner and divined the cause of it with a ready
interpretation
.
`I have told you frankly the facts relating to myself just as they are,' he
said trying to assume a frank bearing and tone as he addressed the Jew. `This
interview with the Duke took place five weeks ago!'
`But a month after my last loan of five thousand pounds to you. You did
not keep it long my lort!'
`That is my affair. When I saw the Duke I had not a guinea in the world.
After receiving his reply I left him in great rage, though I was careful to
disguise
it under an appearance of calm, sorrowful submission to his decision. I
was in debt two thousand pounds at the moment; debts of honor! incurred
within the last three days. It was the necessity of paying these that drove me
to my father!'
`And now you come to me!' said Molock sternly.
`Jew, though I have no means I can make means, therefore return to your
civility, which your race measure as you do gold, by gold! I come to you for
money but not to pay those gambling debts. They are already
paid!
paid the
very moment they became due! paid within three hours after I quitted my
father's
presence!'
`How?' inquired the usurer opening his eyes with a sort of incredulous
surprise
.
`Enoch,' said the Captain of the Yacht, in a low, deep impressive tone of
voice, `I am about to confide to you a secret. Such confidence doubtless is
not new to you! You are a money-lender! Your conscience is gilded. You
act from self-interest and love of gain! So you keep within the law you do
that which seems righteous in the sight of your own eyes. I am about to tell
you
how
I got that money the Duke haughtily and cruelly denied me; and also
I am about to inform you how I am to get money from your coffers!'
`With shurities,
yesh!
mitout dem
no!
' ejaculated Molock significantly
touching with his thumb the key of his iron-box which hung at his girdle.
`Enoch, you know there is a law in the land against usury!' said Dauling
impressively.
`And you know you have made yourself amendable to this law by your
transactions
with me!'
The money-lender drew back his person and fixed his eyes with fierce
suspicion
upon the gamester.
`Nay, do not fear, Enoch! no one shall know that you have taken from me
twenty thousand pounds for eight thousand! or loaned me money at forty-two
percent. You confided in my honor, and if I did not regard my own I should
fear the scorn of all honorable men, should I be an informer. Yet it is in my
power to do you mischief! But I only allude to this, that I may have
assurrance
of
your
secrecy in the matter I am about to confide to you. Perhaps,
however,' he added with a haughty contempt, `perhaps I shall find a surer
security
in your love of money!'
`Vat secret ish given to me in pusiness I never petray, my lort,' answered
Molock with a countenance wholly unmoved by the insulting words and
manner
of the Duke's son.
`Know then, Enoch,' said Dauling, lowering his voice and approaching his
lips to the Jew's ear, `that I obtained the money by drawing a check for it in
the Duke's name!'
`Forged a draft? exclaimed the usurer with a look of astonishment.
`Yes,' answered Dauling bolding. `What else could I do? I was owing
debts of
honor
to the amount, as I told you, of two thousand pounds! They
had to be paid within three hours, for I had spent several hours in searching
for the Duke to get an interview! Debts of honor are imperious! I left the
palace of my father with my decision formed; and in a coffee-house not far
distant, drew a check of three thousand pounds on the Duke's banker. I had
no fears of detection from the signature for I knew it was perfect; and as I
presented it myself I knew it would not be closely scrutinized!'
`You were a very pold man, my lort, to offer the draft yourself! It vas very
dansherous, my lort!'
`I had no alternative. The draft was cashed. I paid my debts of honor and
felt relieved.'
`Vary moosh, I tare say, my lort,' said the money-lender with a slight shrug
of the shoulders.
`With the other thousand I repaired to the L Rooms to play for the
purpose of winning enough to replace the amount of the draft at once. I
succeeded
in my wishes and the next day replaced the sum I had drawn, and by a
dextereous manuvre got possession of the forged draft, which else would
have been retained on file against me.'
`You vere fortunate, my lort,' said the usurer, who had listened with
interest
to his money operations; for those who boldly managed, were always
entertaining
to him.
`Yes, it might have gone hard with me had it met the Duke's eye. But I
was shortly in want of more funds, and having one night gone ashore after a
week's pleasure trip with the yacht to Portsmouth, at the place to play. I lost
every thing. I had not a half-crown left. I had to stay in Portsmouth some
two days longer as the Queen and her party, whom I had taken down, were not
yet ready to return. I could not be two days in Portsmouth without money.
So I resolved to try the Duke again.'
`Vas he in Portshmouth, my lort?' asked Moloch dryly. `I tink if he vas
you would get no monish no more as pefore.'
`No, the Duke was at his seat near London. But I had no intention of
making a personal application. My proud spirit had been too keenly
wounded
before. No, Enoch, this is what I did! I made a draft on his Grace for
five thousand pounds, drawing it in my own name and forging the Duke's
acceptance
to it. This draft I made at thirty days. Well, I got the money upon
it in Portsmouth and the draft was sent to a banker here for collection! As
my ill-fortune would have it the Queen's daughter the princess Amelie was
taken ill at Portsmouth and the Royal Party decided on returning to Windsor
by land. Two weeks of my draft's time had already passed when this
decision
was made, and I then weighed to sail round to London alone. But I lost
my foretopmast in a gale and was forced to put into Cowes to repair. With
all the haste I could press matters, it was a week before I could leave there,
and adverse winds made it four days more before I reached the Thames. From
the Pilot I received a packet which I found to be from the Secretary of state,
ordering me to proceed up the river with the yacht and anchor off against the
Tower until further orders. I have been at my anchorage now this is the
third night without receiving any orders, although I have reported myself.
The truth is I have my fears that my forgery is discovered and that I may see
the inside of the Tower. I know it is for the Duke's interest to get me out of
the way; and as he would not like to bring me and his family matters up
before
the criminal tribunal, he may have taken advantage of his discovery and
engaged for me a snug birth for life in one of the dungeons of the Tower.
He has only to breathe his wish and the thing is done at his will! This is
however, perhaps, only an unfounded notion of my own fears. But the
fact
is
that my draft is due to-morrow and that if it is not paid then the Duke must
hear of it before night.'
`You did vary ill, my lort, to gif your own name to it! Any oder name, mit
de Duke's acceptances was just as goot. 'Tis was vary wrong.'
`I see it was now!'
`Vary. If you bad put anodder name, den te Duke vould nevar know it vas
you!'
`But you forget that without some responsible name I could not have got
the draft done. I had no person but myself. The broker I knew would take
my draft without question!'
`I see, I see! Vat you say is correct, my lort. You could not vell done oter
vays! Tish a pad pusiness!'
`You must help me out of it,' cried Dauling with anxiety.
`It is a
vary
pad pusiness,' repeated Enoch a second time, shaking his head
very gravely. `Haf you no moneish, my lort?'
`I lost every pound I had received at Portsmouth, except two hundred,
before
I left there. That two hundred I left to play with when I got to London.'
`And tis moneishtis doo huntret pounts! Haf you lost tis too?'
`All! I was fortunate the first night of my arrival and won! But last night I
lost every thing. To-morrow the draft comes due! I drew it with the hopes
of being able to win enough to meet it before its maturity! But you have seen
how I am at fault,' he said bitterly; and rising he paced the rich carpet of the
Jew's private chamber with a hurried step.
`Vhy dit you not draw on te government ant set te amount down to
damashes
?'
asked the wily banker.
`Ha! you are as deep as I am, Moloch,' exclaimed the captain of the yacht
stopping and laughing with a sardonic expression, as he regarded Enoch's tace.
`Know, oh. Jew; that I have done this thing already from Cowes; but I did
it only for three hundred and fifty pounds over the damages the gale did the
yacht! If I could have drawn for five thousand with safety, or any chance of
its being paid, I would have done it you may depend.'
`Vat dit my lort do mit te tree hundret ant vivty pounts?'
`Lost every farthing of it before I left that port.'
`My lort loves play vary moosh.'
`It is a passion with me! But, I swear to you, Moloch, if you will help me
pay this sum to-morrow I will never play again.'
`Vat interest has te Jew in my lort's play? 'Tis just te same to me if my
lort play or my lort stop play. I haf no interest in te matter ony as I gets all
my moneish vish I has got, pleash fader Abraham!'
`True. I ought to know that on the contrary you thrive on other men's vices
and follies. But I
must
have money to-morrow, Moloch. The broker holds
the draft and unless it is paid before two o'clock it will be presented to the
Duke. He only would want such a plea for getting well rid of me! His
daughter, my legitimate sister, is now coming forward in her tenth year, and
he thinks I might not honor the relationship! In a word he would not hesitate
either to give me up to the authorities as a forger, or by consent of the King
place me secretly in the Tower. I never see the King's boat quit the stairs
but I think it is coming on board for me! Help me to get this draft off my
hands and I will do anything for you, Enoch?'
`Te Christian plead humbly to te Jew vhen he would haf money; and curses
him vhen he no more needs him! Vat can the Jew do? Shew me how I can
let you haf money?'
`I want five thousand pounds. Security I have none. Nay, do not smile
so sneeringly! Listen! The money I must have to-morrow, else I am a
ruined man! Bastard though I am yet. I am a gentleman and men treat me as
such. I have royal blood in my veins and am proud of it. Before the world I
would keep it untarnished by any low crime. Nor would I give my father
cause to get rid of me by having him make the discovery of my forgery. To
conceal it I am ready to commit a greater! Moloch, you have money, and by
money you live. More,
more
, MORE is your cry! You ask not for the sources
of the golden stream that flows into your coffers. You care not whence it
comes, be it from Palestine or Pagandom, so as you are enriched. Now to get
the money I want I am ready here, with this pen I have seized in my grasp to
put the Duke's name to paper in any shape and to any amount under twenty
thousand pounds that you may draw up! You shall cash it, and for your pay
receive a thousand pounds down beside the usual discount.'
Moloch's eyes brightened and his whole manner instantly changed.
`Vill my lort make a draft for twenty tousant in his own name and endorse
it mit te Duke's?'
`I will do it,' answered the captain of the yacht, with emphasis, his features
lighting up with hope as he fastened his gaze earnestly upon the face of the
Jew.
CHAPTER III.
The Forged Draft.
The
money-lender was thoughtful a moment and seemed to be weighing
the risks. At length he spoke and said,
`My lort, you say you vant tventy tousant pounts. Vary goot! Tventy
tousant pounts is moosh money.
`I would rather not make it more than ten thousand.
`Vy no more dan den tousant?'
`Because I may not be able to repay it!'
The Jew laughed with his eyes in a manner peculiar to him, and replied,
`Vor dat matter, my lort, it might pe von huntret tousant. Put to the
pusiness
.
You haf five tousant to pay to-morrow?'
`I have or am ruined!'
`You haf no shurities?'
`Not a guinea's value.'
`You come to me to ashk me to loan you ten tousant pounts?'
`Yes; for which I will give you a forged acceptance of my father!'
`All vary goot, vary,' said Moloch dryly, and lifting his arched eye-brows;
`but if I cash dis paper vot am I to do mit it?'
`Present it to the Duke's banker. It will be paid.'
`Of dat I haf no doubt. my lort. But vhen it is py ant py discover to pe a
forshery, vat shall I do?'
The captain of the yacht paced the room several times in perplexity before
he replied,
`Make it twenty-five thousand pounds and you are at liberty to say that I
presented it to you.
`Den vhy did you not forge te acceptance, my lort, for tis amount and
presend
it yourself mitout comin to me?'
For this reason: I had began to conceive that the Duke's Banker suspected
me. I was afraid to offer another, and especially while the one that is due
tomorrow
remains unpaid. This alone would lead to a suspicion; for the Duke's
banker knows of the existence of my draft from Portsmouth, the broker who
has it for collection having gone to him to get his testimony as to the
signature
.
This I learned this morning from the broker in a round-about way.
Therefore, Moloch, I had no resource but to make a confidant of you.'
`If I cash an acceptance for twenty-fife tousant pounts, why are you more
villing I should tell I got it from you my lort, dan if it vos only vor ten?'
asked
Enoch, eying him closely.
`Because I see now what did not occur to me at first, that you will be held
responsible when you present the draft on which you have given me the money
unless you can give the name of the person from whom you received it; for it
must at maturity be discovered to be a forgery. Therefore, I have made up my
mind if my name must be given it shall be for a sum of high value. But pledge
me, Moloch, that you will only give my name when you are called upon to the
Duke in person and in private!'
`Dis I promise.
Then give me paper and let me make the draft. For what time shall it be?'
asked Dauling, seating himself and removing his cap, exposing, as he did so,
a noble head and kingly brow that bespoke his royal lineage. An expression
stern and dark clouded his features and marred with guilty purposes the
dignity
of his manly countenance.
`Tree days!'
`Three days!
Thirty
it must be?'
`It is safer at tree day,' answered the Jew quietly.
But three days will not give me any time to win at play?'
`Nor will thirty, my lord. Tree day or not at all. Pefore thirty day te
Duke may shange his banker ant I lose all I gif you pefore I get it pack again.'
But I expected if you gave me the money on it to-night you would take it
to the Duke's banker in the morning and get it discounted and off your
hands.'
`No. I sall take it to te banker just two minute no more, just two minute
pefore te last hour of its payment expires. I sall den hand it to do banker and
he vill pay it vith hurry so as not haf time to look too sharp, pecause he would
not like to haf te Duke's name dishonored py delay. Therefore, as I must lay
out of my moneish, I cant pe out of longer den tree day.'
`Well,
three days
then! My mind is made up as to the step I shall take, if
I once get this Portsmouth draft taken up.Three days, he added in a
halftone
and frowning till his brows met, `three days will serve me as well as
three hundred. What I have resolved upon I shall execute. I will once more
meet my father. Three days is long enough to put off the meeting. You are
waiting for me, Enoch. Well, I will write and sign.
The commander of the yacht then rapidly wrote a draft upon the Duke of
, for the large amount of twenty five thousand pounds, and was about
to sign it with his own name when the Jew laid his hand upon his:
`You must put some oder name, my lort, if as you say, you are suspected!
`Whose?' demanded Dauling suspending his pen over the paper.
`Can you imitate this closely?' asked Moloch, drawing a note of hand from
a black leather pocket-book and showing him the signature of `Foster,
Murray
& Co.' at the bottom of it, one ofthe wealthiest banking firms in London
`Yes,' answered Dauling on glancing at it.
`Sign den, dis names to de draft! It vill pe petter nor yours, my lort.'
Dauling did not hesitate to do as he was requested, and placed the forged
signature accurately imitated at the foot of the draft.
`Now te Duke's acceptance!' said Moloch after he had examined carefully
the two signatures, and smiled approvingly.
The officer with a ready pen placed the forged acceptance of his father,
across the face of the draft and the paper was completed!'
`Vary goot,' said the Jew placing his spectacles more closely upon his eyes
and carefully inspecting the draft. `'Tis now goot negoshiable papers!
Twenty fife tousand pounts ish a goot deal of moneish! It vill make de Jew
poor to give all dis! Put if I vill do dis paper for you, my lort how mooch
vill my lort gif me vor de risks?'
`Two thousand pounds!'
The money-lender smiled sneeringly. `No, no, my lort! I must haf ten
tousant ant gif you te palance!'
This was spoken very positively. Dauling fixed upon him a look of
surprise
and anger, and seeing by his countenance that he was in earnest he
exclaimed
fiercely,
`Accursed Jew! Do you dare to propose such a thing to me! I will give
you no more than two thousand pounds.'
`Den I can't do it my lort!' answered Moloch firmly and calmly.
`I will give you three thousand, and not a guinea more so help me the God
of Abraham!'
`Den dere is an end to our pusiness, my lort!' coldly said Moloch turning
his attention again to his accounts, in poring over which the entrance of
Dauling
had interrupted him.
The captain stood and regarded him with dark looks for a moment and then
said in a changed tone,
`Enoch, I will make it five thousand. Pay me twenty and let me depart;
for my time is measured!'
`Not a farthing less, my lort!'
`Are you not satisfied that the draft can be discounted?'
`It is perfectly goot, my lort,' he answered smoothing it over with his
forefinger
as it lay upon the table before him.
`Then you have no risk. All the risk is mine, as you will give up my name
when you are called upon to declare how you came by it! You shall have only
what I have offered you!
`Ten tousant pounts, my lort!' answered Enoch without lifting his eye from
his accounts.
`Ten thousand devils! I will not give it! You are a brazen-faced usurer,
and know you, Jew, that you are in my power! You know that you have
infringed
in the most bare-faced manner the severe Statutes recently enacted
against usury, and have laid yourself open to all its terrible penalties. Your
vile terms have exasperated me; and I now swear to you that unless you do
this on my terms I will make you a public example. You are in my power and
beware.'
`And you, my lort are in
mine
,' responded the money-lender taking up the
forged draft and thrusting it into his bosom.' So long as I hold this evidence
of your guilt I do not fear you!' As Moloc hspoke his lip curled with a bitter
smile of triumph aungled with contempt.
`Ha! Do you dare, infernal Israelite?' cried the Commander of the Yacht,
drawing his sword and springing upon the Jew to wrest from him the fatal
paper
.
Moloch who was a taller and larger man than his visitor, though
Dauling
himself was of a powerful frame, sprung to his feet and seizing the wrist
of his sword arm with a pressure that caused him to drop the weapon at his
feet. As it fell Moloch kicked it across the chamber, and then releasing him
said calmly,
`Dis ish no vays, mine lort, to get your monish! If you vants your draft
take it and seek some other broker.' As he spoke he drew from his breast the
paper and laid it upon the table. Dauling stood silent and gloomy, looking
irresolute. He did not extend his hand to take up the draft, glad as he would
have been to have had possession of it by force the moment before.
`Moloch,' he at length said in an impassioned tone of voice, `let us not be
foes! Give me fifteen thousand on the condition you will not give up my name
as a party. I begin to fear that it will be unsafe. My plan was to let you
give it up to the Duke alone when you should be called upon, telling him it
was purchased by you from me in the way of business; and I then
contemplated
calling on the Duke in person, confessing the whole, and assuming the
penitent, throw myself upon his mercy; which, if I failed in, I meant to take
another course, which it is not expedient to detail to you. I shall, however,
still see him in person! But I fear that the Duke will think more of the loss
of his twenty five thousand pounds than of my relationship to him and give me
up to the laws! In a word I dare not trust him. Therefore, if you can devise
any other way by which to escape the responsibility, and I know you are
fruitful in expedients, I will give you ten thousand pounds.' Here Dauling
paused; for he saw that the money-lender was already thinking deeply, as if
struck by his suggestion and its feasability. The Jew sat silent full three
minutes his eyes fixed upon the carpet and his manner wholly that of one
absorbed
in some deep project. Dauling watched him closely and anxiously.
At length the Moloch raised his head and said,
`My lort, 'tis a great risk, vary great dangers, put I vill do it! Your name
sall not pe gifen. I can do it mitout, put te risk is immense, my lort.'
`And the sum I give you is immense.'
`It ish a vary goot sum, my lort,' answered Moloch indifferently. `You vill
half fife tousant to take up your draft from Portshmout, and ten tousant left,
and no fear from arrest for forsherg! Ten tousant pound to me is not moosh
for all dis happenesh.'
`You swear you will not devulge my name.'
`I shwear it.'
`Place your hand upon your thigh and swear it by the faith of Israel,' he
said commandingly.
`I shwear it by the faith ov Israel, my lort,' answered Moloch, laying his
hand upon his thigh and speaking the words with solemnity.
`Now I am free again,' cried Dauling with animation. `Please you, good
Enoch count out your soverigns and bank-notes.'
`So much monesh I haf not in my house, my lort. If you vill call to-morrow
at elefen o'clock, you sall haf te vivteen tousant pounds.'
`I must have it
to-night
,' he demanded imperiously.
`I haf not one tousand pounts in my shest, my lort! Mine moneish ish in
te panks. Come to me in te mornins' at elefen and you sall haf te moneish!'
The officer stood a moment silent and thoughful and then replied,
`Be it so, Moloch. At eleven o'clock I shall be here! Now a good night
to thee!'
`Goot night my lort,' answered the Jew; and taking up a little silver bell
that stood before him upon the table, he rang it and the beautiful Rachel came
into the chamber.
`Neice, see this gentleman down stairs and through the shop,' he said to
her.
`I am honored by so fair a guide, charming Jewess,' said Tudor Dauling
bowing with an air of gallantry to her; although this courteous manner sat ill
with the haughty and sinister expression that was upon his features, as if he
despised the race to which the young girl belonged, while he admired her
physical beauty.
`My niece little understands the fair words of flattery, my lort,' said the Jew
coldly as if displeased.
`Nay, Enoch, I am no gallant for the sex. Little care I for any of them,
else might I seek to mend my fortune,' he added in a tone meant only to reach
the Jew's ear, `
by taking a wife
. But seldom have I given them more than a
passing glance, for rare must be the beauty that causes my eye to linger.
Such beauty is that of thy niece! But good night. To-morrow at eleven!
Fair daughter of Abraham I follow thee.'
Thus speaking the captain of the yacht preceded by Rachel, who all the
while had stood silent and down-looking, left the sumptuous private chamber
of the rich money-lender, Enoch Moloch, and passing down the dark
stairscase
emerged into the shop below. Then with a slight bow he took leave of
the Jewess, and wrapping his cloak closely about his face went forth into the
street and rapidly pursued his way in the direction of the strand.
Rachel lingered a moment, with her forefinger placed upon her lip, as if
reflecting
upon the mingled indifference and admiration towards her of the dark
featured noble looking stranger, when the sound of the silver bell recalled her
to he uncle's presence.
`Well, neice, what think you of my noble visitor,' said Moloch, speaking in
the Hebrew tongue with a dignity of accent and enunciation that singularly
contrasted the badly pronounced English he had made use of in his
conversation
with Tudor Dauling.
`Is he noble?' asked the maiden and she seated herself upon an ottoman
opposite
to him.
`What dost thou think of him?' repeated Molock with a half-smile;
forduring
his brief interval that had elapsed since the departure of the
commander
of the yacht he had conceived a thought in his inventive brain, which the
last words of the other had given bot spark and fuel.
`I think him a man of large statute, about eight and thirty years of age,
with a haughty air and a countenance exceedingly noble and handsome yet at
the same time singularly forbidding.'
`Could you love him, Rachael?'
The Jewish maiden started slightly, and then opening her large black eyes
rested them upon the face of Molock with an expression of surprise and alarm.
`Love him! oh no! I should fear him were he powerful and I in his power.'
`Yet methinks he looked kindly upon thee!'
`It was not a look a maiden could meet or that would please her. It was
cold and supercilious at the same time insultingly condescending. So might
a cavalier regard a handsome gipsey in her rags! Why dost thou ask me these
questions with such a serious face? Is the man not a Christian? Am I not a
Jewess? You mock me in asking me if I would love him!' she said with a
look of displeasure the proud style of her beauty.
`Nay, be patient, Rachael. Christians and Jews have wed ere now. You
are now of full age to have a husband. You have refused more that one
Israelitsh youth who has sought your hand of me. Your heart is therefore
free. This stranger who just left us is by no means so bad a man as to his
heart as you think. He has been in great perplexities and they have soured
his visage. He is nominally a Christian but I assure you he has as much
reverence
for Joshua as Jesus. His religious scruples will not be in the way. I
am desirous that you should try to captivate him and win him.'
`Would you have me marry him indeed, uncle?' she asked earnestly.
`Truly I would.'
`He would scorn me. Besides I know him not. Nor could I wed a man I
have no love for, much more a Christian,' she said jeeringly; and rising up
she walked the space before the table with a quick tread and a look much
excited
.
Moloch, in the meanwhile sat perfectly composed yet with a firm
aspect
.
`Know you, Rachel, that this man is not only noble, but Royal?'
`How?'
`He is the illegitimate son of the Duke of , the near relative of the
King. The Duke has no other son, but one daughter about ten or twelve
years of age, by a later marriage with the sister of Prince .'
`His royalty is tarnished by his birth! I regard him less noble than I did
before.'
`But the world does not. Men look upon him in the same light as if he
were born in wedlock. The blood flowing in his veins covers all disgrace.
He is admitted into society with honor and save the title and inheritance is as
good as the Duke's lawful son. His father was greatly attached to him until
he became married and had a daughter, when by the influence of the Dutchess
he was sent a way from the paternal roof. The rest of his time till he came
of age he passed at Eton school and at Oxford, the Duke in the meanwhile
lavishly supplying his expenses. But after he became of age he pursued a
course of the most extravagant dissipation; which, at length, reached to such
lengths that the Duke became embarrassed to meet his exorbitant drafts to
pay gambling debts; for gaming was his passion. Finally his father after
long forbearance, firmly refused longer to give him money. But he made
over to him an estate worth about twenty thousand pounds, on the condition
that he should reside on it, live within its income, and marry within one year.
Tudor subscribed to the terms and conditions and returned to his estate.
Here he did remain very quiet for a year, but yet did not marry.
Nevertheless
the Duke did not insist upon this so long as he was steady. There he
remained until last year in the most perfect retirement, but the secret of his
content was, that he had surrounded himself there with all the gay scenes he
so much loved in London. Fine rooms in his villa were fitted up as gaming
rooms, and his house was the resort and almost the habitation of the principal
gamblers of the metropolis. He took for his part a certain percentum of all
the money won there by others and by this means lived, and lived
expensively
.
As the Duke never came to see him, this state of thing's only reached his
ears inpartial statements, and by no means in their truth, as Tudor conducted
all thing's about his establishment with the greatest caution and secrecy.
But his good fortuneturned and reverses rendered it necessary he should
mortgage his property. The deeds of the whole are in this chest,' added
Moloch
placing his foot upon the iron box at his side.
`And this is the man you wish me to sacrifice myself to, uncle,' cried the
Jewess with indignant surprise.
`Nay, listen to what more I have to say, and then decide,' he answered with
composure.
`I will hear you, uncle,' she replied, reseating herself upon the ottoman and
folding her arms upon her bosom with a haughty air that exceedingly became
her.
CHAPTER IV.
The Bank-Clerk.
Moloch
proceeded for a few moments to explain to Rachel, more in detail,
the nature of the business which the captain of the yacht had with him. When
he had ended he said with a scorching look, surveying her handsome
intelligent
face,
`Do you clearly understand all this, niece?'
`Perfectly, uncle!'
`Now I will tell you how you can serve me in obtaining this money on the draft.
I have to run all the risks and my lord is not to be known in the transaction.
Neither do
I
wish to be. Here, you see, is the paper which he has so boldly
forged!' added Moloch, showing her the draft. `He has not only forged his
father's acceptance but the names as drawers of one of the first bankers in
London
.
The paper is goodnone better if it can be made to pass.'
`How can I serve you, uncle?'
`By disguising yourself as a young gentleman to-morrow and driving in a
cab to the Duke's banker and presenting the draft in person!'
`What costume shall I assume?'
`That of a banker's clerk. I have the costume in the shop. The disguise
must be perfect and complete. You nor I must never be suspected in the
matter
,
and I shall trust to you to play your part with skill.'
`Have I ever deceived your confidence, uncle?'
`No, child, no! You are faithful and artful. I feel I can trust you. You
will present the bill at the Cashier's desk, as clerk of the House which draws
it. It will be paid if you are self-possessed.'
`I shall be composed, uncle.'
`That I am convinced of. The third day the forgery will necessarily be
discovered, and then you will find the usefulness and necessity of your disguise.
As a young man,
seemingly
, was seen to present the bill, they would never
think of suspecting a female. Thus you will escape as well as myself.'
`There is danger, uncle; but I will undertake it. There is nothing I will
shrink from to serve you and do injury to the Christian!' As she spoke her
dark eyes flashed and her lip curled with the proud hatred a beautiful Jewish
woman only can express when she speaks of the persecutors of her race.
`If then you would injure them farther, wed this Duke's son! You know
what I have secretly confided to you touching him. It is true. You see what
it will avail you. Do as I wishwed him and your reward will be what I have
told you.'
`Of this I will think by and bye, uncle. At present let me only give my
thoughts to the perilous task you have imposed upon me.'
After some further directions given by Moloch to his neice she took up a
light and bidding him good night left the chamber to retire to her own: while
the money-lender, after locking his strong box and arranging his papers, went
down into his shop to give orders to the two Jewish lads to close it for the
night.
Tudor Dauling left the habitation of the Jew with a feeling of
disappointment
which was, however, somewhat modified by the hopes held out on the
morrow. Nevertheless he was chagrined and vexed at being unsuccessful in
obtaining from Moloch even a sufficient sum to enable him to venture a stake
at play. The night before he had lost his last guinea and this evening came
on shore with the view, if he obtained means from the money-lender, to make
an effort to recover his losses. But he had now left his shop without anything
beyond a promise for the next day.
`It is useless for me to seek the playing saloon with empty pockets! he said
as he came to the corner of two streets, one of which led to the Halls he had
so much frequented, the other to the stairs opposite his yacht. At length, after
lingering a few moments he slowly retraced his steps towards the water-side.
As he reached the stairs he discovered, by the light of a lamp, a youth
approaching
.
As he came nearer he saw that it was Percy, one of his
midshipmen
.
The lad was passing him; but after eying him closely he stopped and
addressed him, touching his cap.
`Captain Dauling?'
`Well Percy.'
`Ah, then it is you, sir. I wasn't quite sure!'
`Where are you going? Why are you ashore to-night?'
`I came to seek you, sir.'
`And pray where were you going to find me?' asked Dauling sternly yet
with irony.
`To St. 's Saloon, sir.'
`So then you know where I have been of late, youngster?'
`Yes, sir. If you remember, I came ashore with you the last two nights and
passing up the town after you, I saw you enter there.'
`Well, well. Never go there yourself, boy, if you want to be a happy man.
Why do you seek me now?'
`An express has just come aboard the yacht to see you, sir; but as you
were ashore, I was sent to find you, if possible, with instructions to place this
pacquet in your hand. When the man-at-arms gave it to me, he left, and
relanded
at the Tower-stairs. I immediately took the third cutter by command
of the first lieutenant, and pulled ashore, and was going to seek you, sir, when
you passed me.'
`Let me see the package. Ah! the king's secretary's band, and the royal
seal,' he exclaimed, taking it from him and stepping under the quay lamp which
burned near.
`It was a king's livery-man, who came with the man-at-arms that brought it,
sir,' answered Percy.
Dauling broke the seal, and after reading the contents a few moments, he
seemed troubled.
`An order to get underweigh at sun-rise, and lay to off the tower, to take a
States' prisoner on board,' he said with a muttered tone of ill-humor, and
displeasure
.
`This order I can never obey. I must be present to take up my
draft of five thousand pounds. Moloch
might
be trusted to pay it, but trust
him I will not. If I go my honor is lost, for my forging will be divulged to
the world, and I cast into a felon's cell. Hold! I have a thought. Cannot
some way be invented to delay this matter one dayor even till afternoon?
By three o'clcck I should have my forged draft in my hand and be free, with
the additional sum advanced by the Jew. I could pray for a storm or for a
lightning bolt to shiver my foremast, or do a damage to the yacht to detain
her; for only some accident can set aside this order of his majesty. Confound
this new duty I am put upon. I thought when I took the yacht I should have
all holiday-work, sailing the queen and the royal cortege from place to place.
This order I
cannot
obey. I am ruined if I obey it. Ah, I have the idea!
Percy.'
`Sir.'
`Are the men in the boat?'
Yes, sir.'
`Follow me.'
Dauling hastened down the platform to the steps and springing into the
cutter
,
sternly bade the men give way out into the stream. He took the helm
himself
sending the coxswain forward to take the bow oar.
`Now, Percy,' he said in a low tone to the midshipman as he leant back in
the stern-sheets, `I want a little peice of service from you.'
`What is it, sir?'
`Do you see the coal barge that was moored up stream just above the yacht
at sun-down?'
`Yes, sir, I believe I do,' answered Percy, after looking off into the river
and endeavoring to distinguish the craft in question from multitudinous others
achored all around them.
`You remember its position was just in a line with the current above us.'
`Yes sir; and that you bade them take care how they anchored or they would
drift foul of the schooner.'
`The same vessel! Now what I want you to do is this. I am steering
directly
for the barge. When I reach her side I will pass near enough for you
to spring on board over the bows. The crew, at this hour, will be all turned
in below. After I leave you on board I will pull for the yacht. When you
see me fairly on my deck, I want you to slip or cut the barge's cable and let
her drift dead upon the yacht's bows.'
`She will carry away her bowsprit if not do more mischief, sir,' answered
Percy with surprise.
`She will do no more than carry away the bowsprit, for the current is not
strong enough for her to do more harm!'
`And do you want any done, sir?' inquired the midshipman with surprise.
`Yes. Percy would you like to go to the opera to-morrow night?'
`Of all things, sir.'
`The package you gave me contained an order from the King for me to get
underweigh at sun-rise in the morning.'
`Then I cant go to the opera to-morrow night,' answered Percy in a
desponding
tone.
`No, not unless the barge should happen to fall foul of the yacht and carry
away enough to make it necessary to delay for repairing damages. Do you think
such an accident likely to happen?' asked the captain dryly.
`I would bet a month's pay on it,' answered Percy; that is,' he added
significantly
,
`if thereby I go to the opera to-morrow night!'
`That you may be sure of,' answered Dauling. `I have a good reason of
my own for wishing to delay my departure a day or two. So let us manage
this little affair between us.'
`I am ready, sir,' answered Percy promptly, and elated at the prospect of
the adventure before him and the opera as the reward of his tact and skill.
`Here we are close aboard,' cried Dauling as the boat ranged up under the
black sides of one of the huge coal-barges of the Thames. `Spring lightly
and free.'
The next instant the young midshipman stood upon the deck of the hulk and
Dauling in his cutter shot away down stream in the direction of the yacht.
Percy walked forward without noise, and found all still. A single lamp, only,
burned dimly in the gloomy fore-cabin, the doors of which were ajar.
`They are all asleep,' he said after making his observations. `But I shall
soon wake them up with a sudden surprise.'
He then went aft, and following, with his eye, the course of the cutter, saw
it reach the yacht. He then examined the cable and seeing there were but
three or four turns round the windlass, he concluded to slip it by cutting the
stoppers instead of severing the cable with his knife. A single stroke was
sufficient, and the cable run out rapidly through the hawse-hole and fell,
splashing into the water. The barge no longer feeling the strain binding her
to her anchor, fell off and floated away from her moorings. The swift current
soon bore her onward upon its bosom, and with a fearful velocity the huge
body came sweeping down upon the yacht. Percy seeing that she was likely
to strike the schooner stern on, and do more mischief than was wanted, seized
the helm and, with great exertion, gave her a sheer obliquely, so that her
starboard
quarter would strike the head of the schooner. Nearer and nearer she
came surging downward upon the arrowy tide, threatening destruction to the
graceful little vessel which lay in her course.
All was at once bustle and excitement on board the yacht; for her captain,
at the first perceptible change in the position of the barge had given the alarm
and secured his bows from damage by fenders thrown over them by his crew.
Still, as he saw how rapidly the dark body was coming down upon him, he
trembled for his vessels security, and gave quick and repeated orders to his
men to stand by and defend her bows! He had the cable loosened and slipped
so that it would easily pay out, that the schooner might be in motion also, and
so deaden the force of the shock. But with all this precaution the barge came
heavily upon them, crashing and shivering every thing that projected beyond
the bows, flying-gib-boom, gib-boom and bow-sprit, crushing them, with the
martingale and figure-head, all together, in one confused mass of ruin and
devastation
;
while the force with which she struck her hull made the light
vessel
tremble to her kelson.
The confusion on board the barge was hardly less than that upon the deck
of the yacht; and amid the mingled curses and denunciations of the crews of
both vessels, the barge swung herself clear just as Percy, unseen, by his own
people, leaped into the schooner's fore-rigging. The hulk was borne by the
current far astern, and soon disappeared in the darkness; while the crashing
and cursing that, at intervals, came from the direction which she had taken,
bore to the ears of those on board the yacht, the evidence that she had served
other vessels in the same manner she had treated the royal craft.
The result of the `accident' wasthat the next morning the yacht, instead of
getting underweigh, was hauled into the Tower dock to have her damages
repaired
;
Dauling having previously sent word to the secretary of the situation
of his vessel. The same forenoon, at the appointed hour, he repaired to the
Jew's habitation. Moloch was in his shop cheapening a Dutch cloak to a
customer
.
`Ah, my lort, I'm glat to see you. Volk up stair mit me, iv you pleash.'
On reaching the private chamber of the money-lender, Dauling said,
impatiently
,
`Now, Moloch, the money?'
`It ish not come in from de panker. Vait a leetle ant it vill pe soon here,
my lort.'
`Have you arranged it so that I shall not appear in the matter?'
`Yes, my lort. You vill be all safe.'
At this moment the chamber door opened and a dark young man entered.
On seeing the guest he would have withdrawn but Moloch beckoned him to
advance.
`Have you the money?' he asked in Hebrew.
`I have, uncle.'
`You are true and faithful and a worthy daughter of Abraham. Keep
composed
for the Christian plainly does not recognise you!'
`Speak in a Christian tongue, Moloch. I like not unknown words bandied
about over my head in this fashion. Is it the clerk who went for the money?'
`It is. Who paid it and how did you manage?' said the Jew, addressing the
disguised Rachel in English.
`I went to the bank, and entering sought the cashier's desk, and presenting
the draft, waited until he had examined it.'
`Was he long?' asked the Jew eagerly.
`Not more than a minute. He then counted out the money to me and took
my receipt for it. So I signed my name to it.
`Your
own
name?' said Moloch alarmed and speaking in Hebrew.
`No, uncle. I signed that which first occurred to me. It was John Isaacs.'
`And you took the money and left?' he coutinued in English.
`Yes.'
`Did any one seem to suspect?'
`No.'
`Thou hast done well. Return till I shall call for thee.'
`Bravo! the youth has done Bravely,' cried Dauling as he saw the pile of
notes before the Jew. `So
you
don't appear in the matter at all. We are both
safe, Moloch, and the money in our hand; what youth is this who has
performed
his part so bravely? He must keep concealed or he will ere long be
arrested
.'
`I do not fear. De youth is my neice.'
`Thy neice?' exclaimed Dauling with a start of surprise.
`Yes.'
`Disguised as a banker's clerk?'
`As you hut now beheld her.'
`I should never have suspected her sex. When she throws off this disguise,
she then is safe from suspicion, however close may be the search.'
`She will pe, my lort. But dere ish risk; de risk vas ven she vas in te pank.
Den if tey haf suspect and arrest her, she would have lost her life.'
`That is, unless she informed
who
sent her.'
`Which she never would haf done. She would haf die rather than petray
me.'
`Would you, in such case haf let her die?'
`Would
you
, my lort?' asked the Jew significantly.
`Nay, what is the Jewess to me. She is thy blood!'
`She is much to thee, my lort!'
`How? You speak in an enigma!'
`For
your
sake she took upon herself all this perilous risk!'
`For
my
sake?'
`Yes, my lort. The maiden has beheld thee with eyes of favor; and knowing it was for thee she offered her services.'
`I am truly grateful to her,' answered Dauling looking gratified and recalling
the handsome features of the Jewess. `I am honored I dare say by her regard.'
`You speak with contempt, my lort. It is true she is a Jewess. But she is
rich.'
`Ah, that equalizes all races, and levels all distinctions. I see thy aim,
Moloch
.
I will look more closely to thy neice when I meet her again, for by my
faith, I have not, I must confess, noted her particularly.'
`If you wed her, my lort, she will pe te richest dowried Isaaelitish maiden
in Lonton.'
Dauling eyed Moloch steadily. He wondered that, knowing his character,
and his poverty, he should wish to ally his neice with him. He reflected a
moment and could not but feel that the Jew had some deep scheme at the
bottom
.
Of the Jewess he had hardly thought of in any way, for he was not a
man of gallantry; and he had too much pride and too strong prejudices to
think of an alliance with a Jewess, even with a rich dowry. Nevertheless he
thought it best to favor the idea for the present, hoping yet to discover Moloch's
true motive in wishing the alliance, and trusting in some way to be able to
direct the affair to the advancement of his own interests.
He then turned his attention to the more immediate business before him;
and received from the money-lender the amount already agreed upon.
Placing
it in his money-book he took leave of the Jew, and hastened to the bank
to take up the forged draft for five thousand pounds which had caused him so
much anxiety.
CHATER V.
The King.
Unlike
the dramatic writers, who must move constantly forward in time with
his events, the novelist has the privilege of going back on time and bringing
up the past to the present, like the worker at the loom, he now drops a thread
which is not wanted in the part of the figure he is then forming; but soon he
goes back and takes it up to weave into the next design, and so on till all parts
of his pattern are complete. Availing ourselves of this privilege, we shall,
before proceeding onward any further in the direct line of occurrences, retrace
our path a few hours to about the time on the evening previous, that this story
opened with Dauling on his way from the yacht, to visit Moloch in the Jew's
quarter in Monmouth street.
The scene to which we introduce the reader is in an apartment in St. James'
Palace. It was a room which the king used both as a library and private
audience
chamber. It was hung with tapestry three centuries old, yet the colors
were still brilliant and rich. A few antiquated and massive pieces of
furniture
of the Elizabethan age, stood around the walls, and on one side was a
tall gothic book-case of jet black oak. A large square table stood near it
covered
with books, maps and writing materials, with a guzette or two in French
and German. Upon this table stood a tall silver candle-stand with seven
branches of stag's antlers capped with silver branching from it, a chased silver
socket at the extremity of each horn. In each socket burned a lofty
wax-candle
,
the whole presenting to the eye a magnificent candelebra well becoming
a royal palace. The chamber was otherwise very plainly furnished; two or
three portraits of the king's German ancestors hung above the fire-place; and
a jewel-hilted dress-sword lay across the mantle upon a plain chapeau
distinguished
only by a sample cockade of black silk.
By a large velvet covered arm-chair with a high carved back surmounted
by a small bronzed crown stood a man large in bulk, and something inclined to
corpulency, with a heavy countenance and fleshy chin: yet, withal, with a
clear, lively blue eye, and an agreeable expression of kindness and suavity
about his mouth, which was very finely shaped. His stature was commanding
and his air of dignity and power, at once proclaimed him a monarch. It was
George III. He was dressed in a violet colored velvet coat much worn at the
cuffs and soiled about the collar, with the lace torn off in front; for he had
when deeply thinking, a habit, of pulling at it with his fingers, which he was
now doing with great perseverance. His head was divested of the
silver-powdered
wig, which he was accustomed to wear, and being slightly bald,
exhibited
finely developed outlines of benevolence and firmness; though these
attributes
of character were, as the phrenologist would speak, much
qualified
in his acts by a deficiency of conscientiousness and a large share of
combativeness.
The king had been seated but a moment before, but had risen to walk the
room, and after a few turns paused by his chair and stood there as we have
described him. His eyes were fixed upon a person opposite to him, who had
also risen when he saw the king do so, and who now stood, as waiting the
decision
of his majesty. This person was tall and spare, with a dark full eye and
a countenance full of intelligence and feelin. His person was strikingly
handsome and his air imposing. He was about fifty six years of age but had
the appearance of being under forty five. There was in his address an
unstudied
elegance and quiet dignity, a pleasing union of graceful ease with
boldness and courage, of decision with mildness, that could not fail to
prepossess
in his favor the most indifferent observer. He was attired in a plain suit
of black velvet, and was booted and spurred. This person was the Duke of
the father of Tudor Dauling, and a near relative to the king.
`I am at loss, your grace,' at length said his majesty without looking up,
speaking slowly and as if still deeply meditating, `I am at a loss how to
proceed
in this matter you urge upon me! My love for you, cousin, would prompt
me to do you this service. But I would some other way could be devised.'
`I can think of no other, your majesty. The expedient I have suggested is
the only one I can think of. Tudor must have an end put to his course at
once or he will make himself amendable (as he already is) to the law of the
land, and then, beyond even the reach of your majesty, he will die a
felon's death at the hand of the hangman! Although he is but an illigimate
son, he is my son, and my only son; and much as he has tried my love and
patience
I am still attached to him, and it would deeply grieve me that this affair
should come to light. The blood which flows in my veins and also in your
majesty's, flows in the veins of this unhappy young man! Your majesty, I
know would not wish all England to ring with the infamy that a near relative
of her king was dragged from Newgate to the gallows and there suffered
death for forgery.'
`Of this forgery you are quite confident,' inquired or rather remarked the
the king sadly.
`Yes, your majesty. I was this day at my banker's to make my semi-yearly
settlement with them, when to my surprise I found there a draft dated at
Portsmouth
,
thirty days ago, for five thousand pounds, drawn by Tudor in his own
name and bearing on its face my forged acceptance. He had got it
discounted
in Portsmouth and the broker there had forwarded it to my bankers for
collection
.
It had lain with them unsuspected. Confounded and grieved as I
was at this discovery, I forebore to express my astonishment, and without a
word paid the draft and took it into my possession. Here it is your majesty.'
`It is skilfully done,' responded the king, sitting down and examining
closely the forgery. `I approve of the course your grace took in not
denouncing
it as a forgery to your bankers.'
`But to make a beneficial use of my forbearance, your majesty, it is needful
that very positive steps should be immediately taken to protect both Tudor and
myself against a like occurrence! This may not be the only draft! He must
be checked at once in his career of guilt.'
`If he were supplied with a sufficient income, cousin; would not this
prevent
a temptation like this?'
`Your majesty is not ignorant of what I have, from time to time, done for this
young man, if I may still call him so, who has reached his thirty fifth year!
My indulgence has but given him licence for carrying out his follies! I can
do no more for him! A sufficient income, your majesty? What amount can
be a sufficient income for one who plays so deeply as Tudor does, and never
rises a winner! No, your majesty. He must be at once arrested, ere he bring
disgrace and bitterness upon me and render forever foul a near current of the
royal blood.'
`I perceive your view of the case, cousin. Something shall be done
forthwith
!
Your suggestion that I have him imprisoned in the tower to save him
from Newgate, to which he seems hastening, is one which it would be
injudicious
to carry out. The tower is the state's prison for the realm, and is as
much under the control of Parliament as the king. If I should arrest Tudor
and privately imprison him in the tower, it would ere long be bruited abroad
that there was a prisoner mysteriously and secretly held there, and I should
have to yield to the public voice and declare who he was.'
`I see the position, your majesty, in which such a course would necessarily
place you.'
`He is your son and in your hands you, also, hold the evidences of a crime
that would bring hun to the gallows! Arrest him privately. Convey him to
your castle in the north, and there detain him a prisoner so long as you will.
Perhaps you could soon conquer him and suffer him to go free, holding over
his path ever the evidences of his crime, for which, assuring him on the first
act of his, unbecoming his birth and blood, you would deliver him up to the
laws he has offended.'
`Your majesty knows the peculiar character of this young man! If I could,
for a time, detain him prisoner without bringing about my castle spies and
whispers of public curiosity, yet whenever I should release him, and holding
above his head this forged draft show him the power I hold over his future
course; he would laugh at me, knowing well and truly, your majesty, that I
would never dare bring him to justice.'
`He deserves to be brought to justice this day,' said the king in a tone of
displeasure. `Let the laws have him, your grace.'
`Your majesty forgets the considerations I have already urged against this
stepmuch as his conduct merits such a decisive course. Tudor is very much
beloved by me, still. He is nearer to my heart tkan I dare confess to myself.
He is the child of a lovely woman who gave me her maiden love and all her
heart'a treasures. I was then a young man at Oxford. She was of good birth,
your majesty, and her ancestors hold fame and name in history as brave knights
and wise statesmen. But she was poor and a widow's only child. She loved
me ere she knew my rank, and I adored her with all the ardor of my soul. Two
years of exquisite happiness I passed in the stolen society of this lovely and
virtuous womanfor your majesty I made her my wife, marrying her under
the assumed name by which only she knew me. I deceived her; but thank
God she never knew it to the hour of her death, which took place a few months
after the birth of her boy! But, alas! she knows it all
now!
continued the
Duke looking upward sadly, `and her pure spirit is gazing down from the skies
gently reproving me for my guilt! Can I then desert her child? Can I
surrender
him to an ignominious death?'
`I sympathise with your affliction, cousin,' said the King with emotion.
`Doubtless this sorrow that now comes upon you, is the Providential
judgment
which in this life always follows wrong-doing.'
`If the affliction Tudor has caused me is sent upon me for the injury done
his mother, then have I been punished indeed, your Majesty. Unworthy as his
conduct has been, so long as I can see in his features the beloved lineaments
of her I loved but to injure, so long my heart will yearn towards him, however
severely I may treat him outwardly. Scarce has my sweet daughter, now in
her tenth year, with all the graces of person and mind she possesses, with all
her gentle affection and innocence, scarce has she the hold upon my heart
which
he
retains.'
The king remained silent and began vigorously to pull at the torn lace on
his coat. His brow was bent, his eyes fixed upon the floor, and his mouth
firmly compressed. The Duke watched his countenance with deep anxiety.
At length his Majesty raised his eyes and his countenance cleared up all at
once:
`Cousin, I have it cow, I think. The yacht which he commands is now at
the Tower, where she was ordered by the Queen to wait for her to embark on
an excursion to the mouth of the Thames and so up the land a few leagues to
Morley Castle. The indisposition of one of the little ones has delayed the
contemplated expedition; and the Queen told me an hour since she would
give it up altogether, as it was already so long deferred. Now the yacht,
therefore, is unemployed. Tudor is on board!'
`Unless, your Majesty, he be on shore at some of the gaming saloons.'
`He can easily be found. I will at once prepare an order under my private
seal to be despatched to him by a special messenger, with direction for him to
get underweigh at dawn, and lay to off the Tower to take on board a
states-prisoner
.'
`And who is this prisoner of state, your Majerty, and how is it to carry out
my views with regard to Tudor?' asked the Duke perplexed.
`The prisoner of state is to be none other than the captain of the yacht
himself
,'
said the King smiling.
`I do not comprehend your Majesty.'
`I will explain, cousin. When he lays off the Tower, a boat containing
seven persons shall come off to him and they shall get on board. One of them
shall be masked. He shall be
yourself
. The others shall be four stout
menat-arms
of tried courage, and the other two officers of the Police disgnised as
king's messengers! Tudor shall be instructed to give you the liberty of the
deck, and leave you to the four men-at-arms. In my order I will instruct him
to proceed to the mouth of the Thames where the frigate Serapis is at anchor
awaiting my despatches for America, and after anchoring near her open the
private despatch which the chief of the police will retain for him, by my
command
till then. That despatch will show hun who is the true prisoner of
state, and when he has read it through, reveal yourself to him and who your
companions are. You can then dictate to him your own terms. Shew him
that the Head of the Police, who alone we must take into our confidence, has
a warrant for his arrest as a forger, and that it will at once be served upon
him. Give him the alternative to sail away from England in the yacht (which
I give him) and carve out a name and fortune in distant lands, or to be taken
back to London in the custody of the Bow street officer as a common felon.
If he attempts resistance show him the frigate, the captain of which will be
instructed
to obey your slightest signal, and assure him he and his yacht are
entirely within your power. This is an unusual plan of proceeding, but, your
grace, under the circumstances, I cannot well devise any other. The succes of
it, I think, is sure. His pride of character will lead him to adopt the least
disagreeable
alternative, and as I state in my despatch to him that his return to
England or its waters without permission will be the signal of his arrest as a
common forger!'
When the King had done speaking, the nobleman, who had listened at first,
with incredulous surprise and then, as his majesty proceeded, developing his
plan, with the closest and most interested attention, became thoughtful as if
deeply meditating upon the king's project. His majesty watched him closely
and with an expression of anxiety.
`Your majesty, he at length said, `has manifested in this affair the kindest
interest, for which I know not how to be sufficiently grateful. The plan you
have suggested, at the sacrifice of your yacht, and at the expense of so much
trouble in person, seems to me, on the whole, our only alternative. It is
attended
with some difficulties, but I confess to your majesty, my cheerful
cooperation
!
But whither shall he go? Whereve he wanders he carries a fond
father's heart with him. It will be hard to give him up forever, perhaps to
pursue a course of crime and bloodshed!'
`Either he or yourself, my lord Duke, must be sacrificed,' said the King
firmly
.
`If he remains in England he will involve you, perhaps, irrevocably, when
he knows you will not prosecute. It is better he should be exiled, and I trust
your grace will feel the expediency of it.'
`It shall be done, as your majesty commands!'
`I do not command, cousin; I do but advise.'
`Your wishes are to me as commands. I require your command or else, I
am satisfied, I should let my weakness betray me in my stern duty!'
`Be it my command then, cousin,' said the King pleasantly. Will you
touch that bell for my private secretary. The despatches shall at once be
made up. The secretary need know nothing, as I will fill up with names,
etc., in my own hand!'
`Your Majesty is most kind.'
`You are too valuable a friend, and I esteem you too highly, my lord duke.
for me to suffer your happiness to be thus daily ventured by this reckless son
of yours, to call him by no worse epithet. Moreover, unless he be compelled
to leave our realm he will ere long be interfering, ten to one, with the
happiness
of the young lady Mary, your daughter, whom, I have heard say, he
loves not too well for occupying his place as the inheritor of your name and
dukedom!'
`Have you heard such things of him?' cried the Duke, becoming very pale.
`Truly have I, cousin; and yet by your looks it seems news to you!'
`It is news, indeed!' answered the Duke faintly.
`Have you never seen ought of this ill-will manifested in him?'
`No, your majesty. On the contrary, Tudor has always shown the most
fraternal love for his sister. I never suspected but that he loved her with
sincerity
and tenderness!'
`It may all be a skillfully worn cloak to deceive your grace,' observed his
majesty impressively. `Does the child regard him with attachment?'
`The most devoted and faithful! She has of late seen him but seldom, but
never does a day pass but she names her brother Tudor with affectionate
language
.
If he is hypocritical only in his love for his sister, would not her pure
love discover the disguise by instinct, and take alarm at once?'
`Perhaps not, my lord duke, perhaps not,' responded the king with a shake
of the head.
`But what motive could he have?'
`That I cannot answer. One thing is very clear, that it would not be
natural
for Tudor to love sincerely his sister under their mutual relations to each
othershe your legitimate child and heiress, he an outcast without other
name than that which you assumed and under which you became the
husband to his mother. On the contrary he has every thing to make him hate
her, and every thing to make him just the reckless man he is! He feels that
he has a right to avenge himself upon you, for the wrong you have done him;
and, I fear, that this vengeance he will not be satisfied in limiting merely to
extracting money from you.'
`What does your majesty mean?' demanded the duke alarmed by this
mysterious
yet significant language.
`I mean that he may be tempted to pierce your heart through your daughter.'
`Your majesty cannot mean' gasped the Dukebut he could speak no
farther, and stood gazing upon the king with the most painful anxiety, his lips
parted, his eyes fixed and wild.
`I do but surmise, your grace. I know nothing sure. Recover from your
alarm. If Tudor is at once aken care of as I have suggested, there need be
no apprehensions.'
`I thank your majesty for this hint. Your majesty is wise and
clear-sighted
!
I will not delay in taking this course you have pointed out. I shall feel
insecure while he remains on British ground. If he perish in far lands he
must perish! My child must not become the victim of his disappointed
ambition
of
his filial vengeance.'
He then took up the little silver bell to which the king had before drawn his
attention and rung it. In a moment afterwards the door opened and a slender,
gray-headed man wearing a long silk gown, and his head buried in a huge
red woolen cap shuffled into their presence. A pen was stuck behind his ear
and the second finger of his right hand was blackened with ink. He was the
secretary.
After a busy half-hour the necessary documents were executed, and that
directed to the captain of the yacht was immediately despatched by a king's
messenger. Its arrival on board and the events which followed are already
known to the reader. The remaining papers were given by the king into the
Duke's possession, and in a little while afterwards he took leave of his majesty.
CHAPTER VI.
The Jewess.
On
reaching the banking-house, Tudor Dauling leaped from the cab in
which he had rapidly been driven there, and entering the vestibule, drew from
his pocket-book as he passed in, the notes with which he was to take up the
forged paper. With a feeling of relief and satisfaction, he approached the
desk of the cashier with the five thousand pounds in his hand. His air was
confident and his manner easy and self-possessed, for he felt he had now his
reputation in his own hands once more.
`Your House holds a draft, I believe, against the Duke of ,' he said
addressing the banker, and displaying the money upon the desk.
`Do you speak of a draft dated at Portsmouth for five thousand pounds?'
asked the gentleman.
`Yes.'
`The Duke himself paid it yesterday.'
`The Duke?paid? How do you mean, sir?' demanded Tudor with
surprise
,
hardly sure that he had rightly understood him.
`His Grace settled yesterday, and although the draft did not mature till
today
,
he preferred taking it up.'
`Are you positive that it was a draft drawn from Portsmouth?'
`Yes, sir! Drawn thirty days since by yourself, if, as I believe this is
Captain
Dauling!'
`Ohahvery rightvery well!' he stammered, now convinced that his
father had really paid the forged paper. He at once divined his motive in
taking
it up, and remaining silent as to its true character. `Yes, yes. The Duke
then took it up himself. He told me day before yesterday as I was coming up
to London, I might call and pay it. But I perceive he has anticipated me by
coming up himself. Good morning, sir!'
The banker bowed respectfully and Dauling quitted the place and threw
himself into his cab.
`Vere shall I drive, sir?' asked the cabman.
He was silent a moment reflecting how to answer this question. His mind
was in a state of alarm and confusion at the startling discovery he had just
made, that his forgery was not only known to the Duke, but that he held in
his possession the forged testimony of his crime. In this perplexity he thought
of his yacht, and a vague idea suggested itself to him, of escaping in her
instantly
from England; but at the same moment he reflected upon her crippled
condition, and bitterly condemned his folly in placing her in this condition;
for he felt convinced, the more he thought upon his act, that the Duke would
not have paid the five thousand pounds without some deep motivedeeper
than the fear of his exposure.
`Drive to Monmouth street,' he said abruptly, for he could think of no other
person than Moloch to advise with in this extremity.
`Vere I tooks yer honor up?'
`Yesdrive at full speed.'
`Yes, yer honordouble fare though.'
`Tribleonly spare not your whip.'
He found Moloch in the room where he had his first interview with him.
The Jew looked up with surprise at his sudden entrance, for he had passed
through the shop, ascended the dark stair-way, and entered the chamber
unannounced
.
`Well, Moloch, the devil has me at vantage this time,' he said, throwing
himself upon one of the velvet chairs that graced the money-lender's private
room.
`Vat ish it now, mi lort? Haf you forgot te right day and ish it too late to
take him up?'
`No. To-day is the day it was due. But what do you think?'
`Vell, my lort, vat ish it?' asked Moloch with a look of curiosity.
`The Dukemy fatherhas been before me!'
`How, mi lort?'
`It seems, as my luck would have it, that yesterday was the Duke's setting
day. So he goes to the Bank for this purpose, and of course this draft was
spoken of as due to day. At any rate he found out that the Bank had such a
draft. Now what do you think he did?'
`Had a Bow shreet officer to lay in vait vhen you come to pay it and take you.'
`Noworse than that.'
`He, perhaps, told te pank it vos forge and te pank arrest you ant you
escape
and come herefor you look as if you haf been in fright, my lort.'
`It was worse than this. The Duke quietly paid the draft, said nothing
about
it being a forgery, so far as I could discover by the cashier's manner, and
took the accursed paper into his possession. There he has it and me, also, as
you perceive in his power! Now what is to be done?'
The Jew remained silent and seemed to be deeply meditating upon what he
had heard. There was, at the same time, perceptibly lurking in his dark
Syrian
eyes a look of inward satisfactionas if he was well pleased in his heart
at this turn of affairs.
`When dit te Duke pay dis monies?' he asked without raising his eyes, which
were fixed thoughtfully upon the carpet.
Yesterday.He has had, since then, the damning proof of my guilt in his
hands. What use he has made or intends to make of it I dare not
contemplate
.
I am fully in his power. If my schooner was in a condition to sail, I
should be tempted at once to fly the country. Each moment I may be
arrested
as a forger and thrown into Newgate!' Dauling, as he spoke, rose and
walked the room with a flushed brow and an agitated step.
`Tish a pad affair, my lort.'
`I must get possession of that draft. I am not safe a moment while it is in
my father's hands. He may see fit to arrest me upon it, and then behold me
swinging on a hangman's gallows! Good God! this idea is horrible. Moloch
you must aid me. You must help me to get possession of this forged paper!'
`Tish a fery pad affair, my lort, inteed,' repeated Moloch with a shake of the
head; `fery pad.'
`You need not aggravate me by repeating that. I know it is badbad
enough. Use your wits and help me with some advice. If you want money
you shall have it.
`Vere ish te Duke now?' asked Moloch raising his eyes a moment to the
haggard visage of the forger.
`He must be at his house in Regent street if he is still in London. I dare
not go there! You, Moloch, must in some way manage to get this proof of my
crime.'
The money-lender's eyes sparkled. A singular expression passed slowly
across his countenance and then vanished, leaving his face perfectly calm and
serene, which was its natural aspect. Dauling stopped before him and
eagerly
surveyed his face as if trying to read there his mind.
`Sit down, mi lort, ant ve vill talk it ofer! Now vot vill your lortship gift
me if I get 'tis forge paper from te Duke's hants?'
`Moneyyes! Money is your only god!' said Dauling contemptuously.
`I will give you one thousand pounds!'
`My lort, one tousant pounts ish little monies to pay for your reputation and
safety!'
`Name then your wages!' answered Dauling indignantly.
`Your lortship vos to-day ready to pay fife tousant pounts for te draft!'
`Human leech! take the five thousand pounds then! I will give it you if
you will possess yourself of that paper!'
`It will be a difficult matter, my lort! Do you think the Duke would give
it to Moloch the Jew?' he asked scornfully.
`You must devise means. Your race are never at a loss for artifices in
extremities
where gold is to be won!'
`I must haf one to aid me, my lort! There is one who has a ready wit, who
may be willing to serve us! You have already seen her tact!'
`Your daughter?'
`My NEICE, she is my lort!'
`Your neice, then. How can she effect this for me?'
`I will insure your lortship that if she will undertake it, she vill succeed in
it!'
`Then entrust it to her!' said Dauling impatiently.
`
She
must be paid too, my lort,' said Moloch quietly.
`Are
you
not paid? reward your own assistants!'
`I am paid this to place the draft in your hands. She is to be rewarded for
getting it from the Duke's!'
`What pay dost thou want, Jew, for thy neice's services?'
`Your lortship's hand!' replied Moloch, fixing his dark, piercing gaze full
or his face, and speaking in a tone of singular decision.
`My hand?'
`Your hand, my lort!'
`Explain yourself, Jew?' demanded the ignoble nobleman wholly at a loss
to comprehend the bold money-lender's meaning.
The condition on which Rachel serves in this affair, my lort, is dat if
successful
your lortship make her your wife.'
`Make a Jew's daughter my wife? Do you know what you say and
who
I
am?'
`Both one and the other, my lort.'
Dauling looked at him a few seconds in silent surprise, and with a brow
black with anger. The insult stung him to the soul. He saw at a glance the
deep policy of the aspiring Jew; but he reflected that without his aid he was
lost should the Duke make use of the power he possessed. He saw that
Moloch
was in earnest; and that the desire of giving his neice in alliance with a
duke's son, blinded him to the stain upon his birth, and the infamy of his
character
.
`Moloch, you jest,' he said forcing a laugh, while he felt like crushing him
for his insulting suggestion. `You know I am not a marrying man. Besides
your neice would gain little honor in wedding one like me.'
`I fear not that. The maiden loves you, my lort, and it is my vish she should
pecome your wife.'
`You forget I am a Christian. Jews and Christians never unite in wedlock.
`It has been done, my lort.'
`What motive, have you, in pressing this strange union? What can her
alliance with me profit her or you? By the rood! There is little in me to
covet
an illegitimate scion of royal blood.'
`It is
because
the royal blood flows in your veins I covet this.'
`I am a forger! Would you wed your neice to a forger?'
`Your forgery is only known to the Duke and myself. To the world you
still are a man of honor.'
`I am poor, Moloch!'
`I have money!'
`Do you mean to say you will give a dowry with your neice?'
`I promise nothing, my lort,' answered Molock coldly. `I will not sell her
to you. If you choose to marry her for the service she will be to you, well.'
`Is this the only alternative, Jew?' asked Dauling after a short silence.
`It is, my lort. Wed her and I pledge you my word the draft you so much
desire to possess, shall be in your hands within four and twenty hours.'
`What shall I do with thy neice as my wife, should I consent, from force of
circumstances to make her such? I have no house but my schooner? Shall
I bring a Jewish wife into the cabin of the Queen's Yacht?'
`Thy wife, for the present, may remain with me,' answered the Jew.
The captain of the yacht stood for some minutes wrapped in gloomy
meditation
upon his perplexing and even dangerous position. He reflected that
he made himself amenable to the outraged laws of his country by an act of
forgery, the testimonials of which were in the hands of the Duke, from whom,
(from this circumstance) he apprehended, he knew not what, severe
manifestation
of his power over him which the possession of this instrument gave
him. Till he had this paper in his own hands he felt he should be in instant
fear of arrest and exposure. To live in this constant lear was impossible. To
purchase exemption from it by sacrificing himself to the Jews' neice he felt
would be paying too dear a price. That Moloch should make this a condition
astonished and perplexed him. The firmness of the Jew in insisting upon it
showed him that it was his only alternative, unless he secretly went himself to
the Duke's house and sought for the draft among his papers (if it were
possible
to steal into his dwelling unseen!) or seek out the Duke and take it from
him by menacing him with death. The idea of casting himself upon his
father's
clemency he did not dwell upon for a moment; for he well recollected
how he had repeatedly before abused it, and, as he believed, shut up his heart
against him. By force, subtlety, or treachery he only expected to attain his
object, and without the Jews' aid he felt he could do nothing effectually and
safely.
`Moloch, this is a hard condition you put upon me,' he said gloomily, `The
draft must be had at all sacrifices,
and had at once!
for, the more I reflect upon
the Duke's manner of taking it up before it was due, and paying the money
without a word to the banker, eagerly grasping at the draft, as it were, to
anticipate
my getting possession of it, the more I am satisfied he means to make
some use of it to hold me in his power. `I will wed your neice! But has
she no voice?'
`I will ask her.' As he spoke he rose and crossed the room to what seemed
a window covered from the ceiling to the floor with drapery. Lifting this with
his hand, he exposed a recess of considerable dimensions and tastefully
furnished
.
Within it sat the Jewess Rachel at a writing desk. She looked up
and smiled at the surprise of Dauling on thus discovering that his interview
with the Jew had had a third party.
`He gazed upon her with surprise, yet not unmixed with admiration. The
lofty character of her oriental style of beauty, the Esther-like lovelines and
dignity of her air, the glorious beauty of her dark Arabian eyes as they
beamed
on him, softly shaded by their curving fringes of long lashes, had an effect
upon him he could not resist. He felt, in his heart, that were she not a
Jewess
,
he would not be making so great a sacrifice after all his objections and
arguments against the union.
`There is the maiden, my lort, let her answer for herself.'
Rachel rose and entered the chamber, moving with a queenly grace that
was captivating and yet singularly imposing. A scarlet ribbon bound up her
black locks and a spencer of bright crimson velvet displayed the superb volume
of her bust. Her diminutive feet were encased in red slippers, and her small
olive tinted fingers were sparkling with rubies. Such was the favorite costume
of the handsome Jewess, and finely did it become her.
`My lord,' she said, `I have but one will, and that is my uncle's. He has
been my benefactor from infancy, and but for his care I should have perished.
He commands. I obey.'
`You then consent to this singular condition he proposes? For you,
doubtless
,
have heard all that has been said, and therefore know who and what you
are to wed?'
`I both know
who
and
what
, my lord;' she said, repeating his words with a
peculiar emphasis upon the two pronouns, which did not strike him then, but
which occurred to him afterwards.
`It is surprising you should be willing to sacrifice yourself.'
`You are not indifferent to me, my lord. I know circumstances have made
you criminal rather than evil principles. You feel yourself at feud with men
of noble acknowledged birth, and hence all your errors of conduct.'
`Errors of conduct! You are charitable, fair Jewess,' said Dauling with a
gratified tone in his voice. `You know me better than I dared to know
myself
.
I am, indeed less guilty,' he added with emotion, `than I seem! I was
honorable in feeling and noble in principle, till, as I grew up to manhood, I
learned the infamy that clung to my name! Then I little cared to keep up in
fair show before the world a counterfeit as if it were genuine! I could not pass
with men for what I would be and should have been, and therefore I became
indifferent how I passed! You have spoken truth, Jewess. I am not by nature
so depressed as I seem! For these words I thank you most kindly! You are
then willing to wed me?'
`Not against thy will, my lord,' said Rachel with a smile and glance that
penetrated his soul.
`It will be against my will, beauteous as thou art. But look ye, fair Rachel,
I am to wed thee only on conditidn you succeed in obtaining this draft.
If
you succeed in getting it, I swear to make you my wife! But in marrying
me, mark you, you gain nothing and risk everything!'
`I gain thee, my lord!' she answered. `This duty enjoined upon me I will
undertake and success is to be the condition of our union. I undertake it that
I may save you.'
`Are you then so much interested in me?' he said, taking her hand.
`I desire to save you, my lord, from the danger your imprudence has placed
you in. After I have possessed myself of the instrument of your guilt, is it
not fair that I should possess what I am to risk so much to save?'
`Be it so. Yet I warn you, noble Jewess, that I have neither house nor
land, name nor honor to endorse them with! Nay, that thou must still remain
an inmate of thy uncle's abode.'
`That I know, my lord,'
`Be it as you will then. Bring me within twenty-four hours the forged
draft my father holds, and I will wed you the next moment after!'
`I will try, my lord,' said the Jewess with a confidant smile. `If it can be
done at all, it will be done by to-morrow ere this hour.'
`Then you will see me here!'
Dauling had already began to feel diminished reluctance, under all the
circumstances
,
to take the Jewess to wife, (for she had really awakened an
interest
in his bosom) so long as he was not compelled to acknowledge or take her
away from Moloch's dwelling; and taking leave of her and the Jew he
quitted
the room escorted by Moloch to the lower door.
`My lort, you had pest keep close avhile till ve see vat can pe done apout
the draft. If te Duke should seek you it would be pad pusiness.'
`I see that, Moloeh. I know where I can be secluded enough till to-morrow.
By the way your neice is not sothat is, I mean to say she is a noble woman!
If she
only wasn't a Jewess!
But Jewess or no I will fulfil my promise on the
conditions, and make her my wife if she succeeds.'
`To-morrow will show,' answered Moloch as he closed the door upon him.
CHAPTER VII.
The Duke.
At
the moment that his son was quitting the tenement of the Jew, Moloch,
the Duke of  was being ushered into the private audience-chamber of his
majesty. The king had just dismissed his prime-minister and was alone
walking up and down, his feet shod in red cloth slippers, an old brocade
dressing
gown hanging back from his shoulders and a cup of coffee in his hand,
this being his favourite beverage which he always imbibed, walking slowly to
and fro the apartment, and talking as he sipped and walked, if he had any one
present.
`Ah, cousin, how is this?' he said, stopping and regarding him with surprise.
`I thought by this time you were well underweigh down the Thames! How
is it I see you so soon again? Have you given up the project?'
`Your majesty, I was prepared with my party and disguises at sun-rise this
morning, and waiting in the Tower for the yacht to come to take us on board.'
`And has the scapegrace run away with it?'
`No, your majesty, on the contrary, he shortly brought the yacht into the
Tower dock, but a wreck! She had been run into during the night by a coal
barge which had drifted from her moorings, and her bowsprit with all its
rigging
was carried away!'
`This is most unfortunate. How long will it take to repair her?'
`I gave orders at once in your majesty's name to Sir John who commands
the Tower, to have her repairs expedited with all celerity; and he told me that
by to-night's ebb tide she could be made ready. This will be at seven
o'clock!'
`This is better. You will then go on board and proceed with your plan of
conduct as already arranged. Did you see Tudor?'
`No, your majesty. After landing he went into the city. Sir John
informed
me that he had left orders for his own crew to make the repairs, and by no
means suffer the dock workmen to interfere.'
`This was a singular order!'
`It is my impression, your majesty, that this `accident' was no accident, but
an intentional thing on the part of Tudor. Sir John informed me that he had
despatched a barge from the Tower to board the coal-lugger to reprimand them
for their carelessness, when the skipper assured him that the cable had been
slipbed by some one who had got on board unseen, and whom he saw leap from
the bows into the yacht when they came in contact. The man said, as far as
he could tell in the night, this person was a youth and wore an officer's
button!'
`This is very extraordinary. Can you give any reason for Tudor's sending
any one on such a business?' asked the king, setting down his emptied cup,
and refilling it with his own hand from a small silver coffee-pot that stood by
him.
`The order to sail this morning, if obeyed, would have prevented him from
going to the bank to take up his draft, which, without doubt, he intended to
meet by some means; in this state of the case he might have brought the coal
barge down upon his vessel to have an excuse for remaining until he could
pay this forged paper, which must have been the uppermost thought in his
mind. The statement of the master of the coal vessel is very positive, and
although Sir John was disposed to question its accuracy and to regard it only
as an excuse, I was at once inclined to give it credence; for such an act is
precisely characteristic of Tudor!'
`It is very possible,' said the king, adding a fourth lump of sugar to his
fragrant
Mocha. `The sooner Tudor is out of the kingdom the better!'
`I think so, your majesty. By evening we shall be ready to embark!'
`But can he be found?'
`If your majesty will have such instructions conveyed to him to be delivered
on his first appearance on board, commanding him to prepare to leave with the
tide, and forbidding him quitting the yacht again, there is no doubt but that
we can carry out our object!'
`I will do this, your grace. Ah, Retsch,' said the king, speaking to his
German secretary who that moment entered, `What do you bring?'
`A letter, your majesty!'
`It is from this very captain of our Queen's yacht,' exclaimed the king, on
opening it. `Hark you, cousin, hear what he sayeth;
Queen's Yacht
,
Tower-Dock
,
7 A. M.
`May it please your majesty, it is with regret I have to inform your
majesty
that in consequence of an accident which last night occurred to the yacht
by the carelessness of a coal-barge skipper, whereby my bowsprit was carried
away and other damage done which it will take three or four days to repair,
it is out of my power to render obedience to your majesty's commands last
night received. I await your majesty's further pleasure.
I am your majesty's very humble servant and subject,
TUDOR DAULING,
Commander of the Queen's Yacht
.
`Now what think you of this, cousin?' demanded the king after laying down
the letter, and taking very deliberately a sip of coffee, `what think you of this?
It seems to me we are doing Tudor injustice.'
`Possibly, your majesty. But this note confirms my opinion.'
`In what respect?'
`He says that the damage will need three or four days work to repair it,
when Sir John says the yacht shall be ready by sundown! It is plain he
wants to delay, and has some deep motive for it!'
`If it was only to meet the draft. to-day will have been all the time he
required
.
I must look upon this as an accident as he represents it. I can't
believe
he would endanger the yacht from any selfish motives!'
`I will not press the point; I would rather much I were in the wrong than
your majesty. The delay of the yacht will change things materially. If
Tudor now goes to the bank he will there discover that I have taken up the
draft, and this knowledge will have upon his acts some kind of effect. It will
turn his thoughts towards me, and lead to erroneous suspicions concerning my
motive; and, that he will not quit London leaving in my possession the proof
of his guilt, I am convinced.'
`The only way, then, is to see that when he returns to his yacht, as he will
sometime to-day, to have Sir John instructed to convey to him my commands
that he remain and superintend the repairs, and not leave it again. Sir John
shall see, if need be, that he
cannot
,' concluded his majesty.
`I have some duties to attend to at my house, and I wish to ascertain if he
has been to the bank; therefore I will now take my leave of your majesty.
When next I see you, cousin, I hope it will be with the news on your lips that
this scapegrace who gives us so much trouble is well over the sea!'
Tudor, on leaving the Jew's habitation, took his way in a direction that
brought him to Ludgate street, ascending which and passing St. Paul's, he
stopped before a palace-like edifice situated a little retired from the street
Is was one of the club-house of London, connected with which in the
extensive
chambers abovestairs, were suites of gaming-rooms, furnished with great
elegance and luxury. He entered the club-room with the air of one at home,
and equal of those who thronged it. He nodded familiarly to several
noblemen
and was recognized by a similar gesture; for although the bend
sinister
marred his shield, his blood and well known paternal lineage gave him
admittance
and a certain consideration among the titled aristocracy. His position
in society was not, however, precisely what it would have been had there been
no cloud upon his birth, In more than one way his sensitiveness had been
wounded; and although others did not shun him for his want of name and
family, he felt a sense of degradation which embittered his spirit, and made
him reckless of character and of consequences. It was this morbid feeling
which drove him for relief to the gaming-table, as parallel states of mind
drove others to the wine-cup. In the excitement of play he lost the sense of
his equivocal position among men of honor; and whether he lost or won, the
oblivion of thought which play brought with it, was in itself a sufficient
recompense
to his spirits.
We shall not follow him into the upper-rooms of the stately edifice into
which he entered. In four hours afterwards he left it without a guinea of the
large sum he had in his pocket-book when he entered. Silent and moody he
took his way towards the Tower for the purpose of going on board his vessel;
but in a little while he reflected that the Duke might be there awaiting him to
arrest him; for, save for the purpose of getting him into his power, he could
not imagine why he should so quietly have taken up the draft. He,
therefore
,
turned aside and entering a low inn resolved to remain in private there
until the next day when he hoped by going to the Jews' to learn the success of
Rachel. Here he remained an hour or two in a restless state of mind, when
as he glanced into the tap-room, he saw several coachmen's coats and other
garments hanging on pegs around the wall. The idea immediately occurred
to him to disguise himself, and under this protection for his person visit the
dock and see if there was any appearance of the Duke's emissaries in wait
for him. The habit he made choice of was that of a countryman, consisting of
a long frock, thick boots, a broad-brimmed white hat, and gloves and whip to
match. The landlord loaned them to him taking in pledge his own suit. In
this disguise he sallied forth, and reaching the Tower gate, found he was
debarred
.
Satisfied from this that his disguise was perfect, he called a
waterman
and getting into his skiff asked to be pulled along the water-side of the
Tower. He soon came near his yacht, which, to his surprise, he found in the
hands of the dock-men, and her damages nearly repaired. Confounded at this
celerity, for he had given orders to his first officer to be leisurely, as there was
no haste, he saw that it was expedient for him to act with decision. That the
king had ordered this despatch he had no question; and as he saw on
examination
of what had been done, that by the close of day his vessel would be in
readiness for sea, when doubtless he would have to sail with his states'
prisoner
,
he began to deliberate what step to take. The morrow would show him
whether the draft would be recovered; and if so, he was then fearless and free
again. To leave before he had got this out of the Duke's hand, he felt was
out of the question.
`I will see the duke myself!' he said suddenly. This disguise will aid me.
I will seek him and forthwith, too. Fortune may favor me, and if I succeed I
am free from bondage to the fair Jewess! To go to the Duke's palace will be
placing my head in the lion's mouth if he should detect me. But I must act
with firmness and without delay; for I cannot exist with a forged draft of five
thousand pounds held over my head each instant by the hand of the man
whom I have reason to fear as my greatest enemy, though, God knows, he has
been mine in refusing me his name which is my right in nature. Pull for the
shore. Give way and land me at the first stairs.'
The waterman looked surprised at this sudden and commanding order from
one whom he supposed a common peasant; but, without speaking a word in
reply he bent to his oars to which not a little alarm gave a new impetus.
We will now change the scene of our story to the interior of the town
mansion
or Palace of the Duke of . It is an hour before sundown. The
Duke has just retired from the dining room to his library where he is seated
writing a letter. It is addressed,
`To His most gracious majesty,
Sire,
I shall depart in one hour for the
Tower
and go on board, or rather, be
taken, en masque
as
the
prisoner of state, on
board the yacht with my party of Police-men! Sir John informs me that the
repairs are already completed, and that the schooner will be ready to sail, down
the river with the first turn of the tide. Then getting Tudor to anchor under
the guns of the frigate at the mouth, we can dictate our own terms to him!
Tudor has not yet been on board; but I have ascertained that he made his
appearance
at the Bank at noon and called for the draft holding the amount in
notes in his open pocket-book. The cashier who suspects nothing, voluntarily
informed me as I entered the banking-house, that he had come to take up the
draft, not
knowing
that it was paid already. `When I told him that your grace
had taken it up in person,' said the banker to me, `he said that it was all very
well; that you had given him the funds to take it up, as he was coming into
town, not expecting to be in London yourself!'
`You see here my liege, Tudor's self-possession and readiness of invention;
for he must, undoubtedly have been taken by surprise on finding the draft in
my possession, yet he seems to have manifested none; at least nothing to
attract
the attention of the banker or rouse his suspicions. Since then I am
ignorant
of Tudor's movements. Once get him on board and down the river,
and I think he will rather set sail for distant lands, than return a prisoner in
the hands of Bow-street officers. Should he not appear at the Dock this
evening
,
I shall promptly advise your majesty.
I am your majesty's very humble servant and cousin,
Edward
.
The Duke had just completed this epistle, and was about folding it, when
an attendant announced a gentleman who desired to see His grace on very
urgent
business. With his thoughts running upon his son the Duke instantly
desired him to be shown into his presence.
`Now, perhaps some message concerning Tudor!' he said looking eagerly
towards the door. `Yet what reason have I to look for any?'
The door was thrown open by the footman, and the Duke beheld enter a
young man, scarce twenty-one with a foreign style of face, but an air
decidedly
noble and high bred. The youth on seeing the Duke bowed with
respectful
courtesy, uncovering his head, and then standing silent before him.
`Pray sir, what have you to communicate? Be seated, sir,' said the Duke
who did not remember ever having seen this very handsome face before.
The young man glanced around the room as if to be sure that he was alone,
and then said
`What I have to communicate to your highness, perhaps should not have a
third party as a listener.'
`We are quite alone. Proceed, sir,' said the Duke with anxious
expectation
of he knew not what, yet which he believed would have reference to
Tudor
.'
`Your Grace has a son, I believe?'
The Duke started at this abrupt inquiry; but immediately composed himself
and answered sadly,
`Yes, unfortunately.'
`He is a source of unhappiness to your grace?'
`You but tell me what all men should know! What know
you
new of
him?'
`I will tell your grace.'
`First tell me, if you will do me the favor, whom I address?'
`I am the son, your grace, of a rich Jewish merchant of London!'
`A Jew! What do you here? What hast thou in common with my son?'
`Much, your grace!'
`Then say on. Out with it! It is some affair of money, I warrant me. But
if he has had money of thy father, and has not paid it, come not to me with
the tale. I have had enough of them.
`Yet it concerns his honor and thine, for your grace to know it!'
`Then out with it! I have heard much evil and can listen to more. Thy
business with me? Be prompt for time presses!'
`The career of your grace's son, Tudor Dauling, is known to me and my
father fully. My father has advanced him monies from time to time!'
`Who is thy father and was he ever repaid?' demanded the Duke abruptly.
`My father is a Jewish merchant, his name I may not give. He
has
been
paid, your grace, save in one instance. It is as follows:My father advanced
him the money upon a draft for six thousand pounds. The draft was drawn
upon your grace and accepted by you. It was due before the close of banking
hours to-day, and should have been taken up by him instead of being
presented
to your grace: this being the understanding. But as the time has passed
by two hours, my father has sent me with the draft to your grace, and I now
have the honor of presenting it for payment.'
The Duke listened, overcome with grief and confusion. Here then was a
second forgery close upon the heels of the first. His first indignant impulse
was to pronounce it a forgery, but he controlled his feelings with a great
effort!
`Let me see the draft?'
The young man presented it to him. He looked over it and saw that it was
the counterpart of the one he held for five thousand pounds. He sighed
deeply
and remained some moments in troubled thought, deliberating whether he
had not best at once to declare it forged and let justice take its course. But
parental feeling-the memory of his son's dead and wronged mother prevailed.
`I hope it is all right, your grace,' said the young man eying him very
closely.
`Yesyes,' answered the Duke recovering himself; `quite right! I was
thinking if I had sufficient funds at command. Due to day! So it is I see by
the date! Can you call to-morrow.'
`Does your grace intend to pay it?' demanded the young Jew severely.
`
No
, sir,' responded the Duke acting from the angry impulse of the moment.
`It is a forgery; sir; and
thus
I destroy the proofs of my son's guilt.' As he
spoke he tore the draft in pieces and cast them at his feet. To his surprise the
young man remained perfectly calm, and his countenance as unmoved as if
nothing had occurred. The Duke surveyed his handsome and singularly
serene face a few seconds in silence and wonder.
`You are not surprised?'
`No, your grace. I knew that it was a forgery when I brought it.'
`Then what kept you from arresting the author of it?' asked the Duke
trembling lest it had been done.
`That I might, if possible, induce your grace to pay it and save him.'
`This was humane and considerate in your father,' answered the Duke.
`We knew you were attached to your son, and that any public exposure
would be likely to grieve you; and that you would pay the amount before you
would see him in Newgate! We could prosecute still, but do not desire to do
so, unless encouraged by your grace!'
`I have no desire to prosecute him?'
`Then why does your grace hold in your possession a similar
forged
draft
for five thousand pounds?'
`How did you learn this?' demanded the Duke, rising from his chair and
advancing a step towards him with a look of astonishment and alarm.
`From his own mouth. In a word, your grace, the truth is as follows:
Your son acknowledged the draft just destroyed to be a forgery and that he
could not pay it. My father threatened to arrest him. They spoke aside
together then, for some time, and he told my father of the draft you held; and
finally by some arrangements between them, to which I am not a party, it was
decided by my father (on what considerations I am not at liberty to devulge)
that if you would surrender the forged draft you hold he would not prosecute.'
`And you have come for this paper?'
`I have, your grace.'
`This is a very extraordinary arrangement! What can your father want of it?'
`It is your son who wishes to get it into his own hands again, my lord! It
is the only forged paper out that involves himself, and he cannot rest until it is
in his possession.'
CHAPTER VIII.
The Two Visitors.
The
Duke heard this revelation with astonishment. The boldness and
singular character of such a procedure confounded him. He, however,
governed
his feelings and said
`Then you have seen him to-day?'
`I have, my lord!'
`Where?'
`At my father's!'
`Whose name you are pleased to withhold!' said the Duke, sarcastically.
`For the present, your grace.'
`I am to understand, then, that if I surrender the forged draft I now hold, that
your father will decline prosecuting my son for the forgery palmed upon him?'
`Such is the condition, my lord!'
`And a very singular one! What can be the nature of the compact
entered
into by this misguided man with your father? But that too, you say
you are not at liberty to divulge!' remarked the Duke in the same sarcastic
tone. `This Jew, your father is a worthy man, indeed, to enter into a
compact
to protect a forger!'
`That forger is your lordship's son!'
`TrueI had not thought of that! He is my son and more's the pity! But
for the life of me I cant see what bribe this draft can be to your father to
induce
him not only quietly to suffer the loss of the six thousand pounds which
I have refused to pay, but also to refuse to prosecute! You seem to be a
person
of intelligence and judgment far above your condition. I am willing to
leave this unpleasant matter in your hands and on your terms. But what
pledge will you give me that you will not prosecute your claim even if I
surrender
to you for my son this forged paper? The whole affair is a riddle to
me!'
`I am willing to deposit with your grace the full amount of the draft, and am
ready to forfeit this sum if we prosecute!'
`You are willing and ready to do this?' demanded the Duke with a look of
wonder.
`I am, my lord,' answered the young man, taking a note book from his
pocket
and displaying on the table before his grace, five Bank of England notes
for one thousand pounds each.
`You are a very extraordinary person. There must be some strange and
mysterious link of union between my poor son and your father to have such
things done in his behalf!'
The color rose quickly into the face of the youth at this remark, but after
letting fall the heavily fringed lids of his dark oriental eyes a moment to the
floor, he recovered the self-possession which had characterised his manner
throughout this interview.
`There
is
a bond of union, your grace, which you shall by and by learn.
Shall I have the notes, my lord?' he said, litting his finger from the pile, and
leaving them before the Duke.
`You mean, will I surrender the forged note?'
`I do, my lord!'
`I will, on the condition that you promise never to mention this unhappy
crime to human ears. Censurable as the conduct of my son has been, I have
still great love for him and much charity; for I cannot but feel conscious that
I have done him more wrong than any other man living; for he is my child,
and yet I refuse him my name! He has told me to my face that I must thank
myself for all his conduct! and I assure you, I do severely blame myself.
Were he a legitimate son, I should have borne with him far less than I do. I
am an unhappy man!' The Duke spoke with deep emotion in his voice, and
for a few moments leant his forehead in his hand and covered his eyes.
`I sympathise with you, my lord!'
`Thanks. But, the more I hear you speak, the more I feel convinced that
you were not educated as the son of a mere Jewish merchant. Your air,
language
,
tone of voice, are cultivated and refined in an unusual degree!'
Here the Duke abruptly addressed a question in French to him. The
young man responded to it in the same language and in the purest idiom. The
Duke then put an inquiry in Italian, which was responded to in the same
tongue and with remarkable eloquence of expression.
`You are not a mere Jew's sonnor yet a Jew!' said the Duke with
surprise
,
and fixing upon him the closest scrutiny. `There is a mystery in all
this matter with you as well as with the rest!'
`I am but the child of an Israelite, my lord. My father's wealth has been
devoted to my education and thus the superiority you are pleased to flatter
me with, is easily explained. Shall I have the notes?'
`No. Take them! Here is the draft. Take it to my son and tell him
thatnay, say nothing to him from me! Yesif you have any influence over
him, urge him to return at once to his yacht, as the King has pressing duty
for him. Urge him to this but not from me. So he is with your father?'
`Not now, my lord. He left not long before I did. But he will call to
know my success!'
`Poor Tudor! I did intend with this draft to win him back to virtue and
honor. I did intend to hold it over him as a means of keeping him within the
bounds of integrity! But take it, and tell himnay, I have no message that
I can frame for him. Urge him only to go on board his yacht!'
`That I will do, my lord!'
`There is the draft! Nayput up the notes. I am satisfied now that you
are Tudor's friend!'
The young man took the draft and with the notes placed them in his
pocket-book
.
He then rose and gathering his cloak about him, prepared to leave.
The Duke arose also, and added
`When shall I have the explanation of this enigma?'
`To-morrow, perhaps, or at least very soon your grace!'
`I am at a loss to comprehend the machinery of this singular proceeding in
relation to Tudor. I act, as a a blind man in the affair, but I trust I shall see
the light soon. I think my conduct in this matter will prove to Tudor my care
for his reputation, and he should himself henceforth a little more regard it!'
The young man now took his leave and the door closed upon him. The
Duke set a moment in a thoughtful attitude and then suddenly pulled at the
bell. It was answered by a youth dressed as a page.
`Merton! Take hat and cloak and follow the young gentleman who just left
here. Be cautious and wary, and as soon as you can, bring me word where
he stops.'
`I obey, your grace,' answered the page, and the next moment he disappeared.
`This is altogether,' said the Duke, `one of the most singular affairs! Such
an extraordinary young Jew too! So Tudor and the old Jew are in a
conspiracy
or compact! What
can
have been his equivalent to be willing to lose his
money for the draft and refuse to prosecute besides! What interest could this
old Jew have in Tudor's being in possession of the forged draft. Well, I am
glad Tudor has had his fears excited; and I hope he will learn a lesson.
Nevertheless, he must leave England, This second forgery confirms me in
the wisdom of the king's decision. Now if he can be got on board his yacht
all will be well yet. Ahwhat folly have I been guilty of! The very draft I
was to hold up to him in the presence of the officers when we should get to the
river's mouth, giving him the choice of exile or a prisoner, I have let pass out
of my hands? I have lost the very key to my power. He would laugh at me
for threatening him with arrest now, when he holds one of the forged drafts
and the pieces of the other lie at my feet. Our plans must be changed; for
that he quits England forever, I am resolved upon! He will forge other men's
names next, and then there will be no protection for him in a father's
forbearance
!
Ah Merton! returned already?'
`Your grace, the gentleman sprung into a hackney coach in waiting, and
the driver drove off at top speed, so as to defy any pursuit except it were on
horseback.'
`Well, let it pass. I shall know by and by I dare say all I desire,' he said
in an under tone. `Wait in the ante-room, Merton, as I have a note for you to
take to the king soon.'
He then took up his pen to add a postscript to the letter he had just before
completed to the King, when to his surprise he found it was missing from the
table. After a close search his suspicions rested upon the stranger, and
believing
that he had taken it and would exhibit it to Tudor, filled him with
vexation and chagrin. He saw at once that it would not only defeat the
King's plot, but would place Tudor in a position of more decided hostility than
ever, towards himself.
`The fates of this day are against me,' he said bitterly.
`My lord duke,' said the page opening the door after the stranger had been
ten minutes gone.
`Well?' responded the duke sternly. `Ho! did you see a letter lying upon
the carpet?'
`No, your grace. But '
`Perhaps the wind has swept it off; search the ante-room.'
`Your grace, I came in to say that there is a Yorkshire man in the vestibule
who insists on coming in, saying he had a letter for you.'
`A country-man? Go, bid him deliver it to you, and wait till I have read it.'
`I asked him for it, and he said, in his broad dialect he would give it only
to your grace's own hand as it wasn't sealed, and `yong eyeses mout peep
between
it and reed deadly secrets!'
`Then show him up. I have strange visitors since dinner. Here comes a
hob-nail footstep; heavy enough for the giant Gog. So, fellow you have been
so ill-mannered as to force yourself into my presence in this coarse guise of
the stable-yard, instead of delivering your message to my page,' said the Duke
surveying his tall stout figure clad in a Yorkshire farmer's frock, boots and
hat, which latter he kept on his head, tied down with twine passed under his
chin. `Take off your hat, sirrah!'
`He says he can't, your grace; he told me, when I bade him do it, how he
had a wen on the top o' it, big as his fist, and he was `mouty feer'd he'd cotch
cold in it, asides, it wasn't sightly!'
The Duke smiled at the droll way the flippant page imitated the peasant's
dialect and then said,
`If you have a letter for me present it?'
`Here it be your lor'ship's honor, said the clown, taking it from a huge pocket
and thrusting it towards his Grace with a backward scrape of the foot by way
of an obeisance. `The gemman said he took it by mistak off the table when
he took oop som' money bills he laid thar; and he bade me tell your lordship's
honor he didn't oopen it at all!'
`It is the very letter I was in search of,' exclaimed the Duke, on casting his
eyes upon it. `What gentleman do you speak of? How came this into your
hands?'
`Voy, yer lordships' honor, I vos a stanin' a lookln'aboot loike, ven a
gemmen
vot vos a gettin' in a coach guv it to me, and sus, sus he, take this to the
Dook and giv it in his own han' and the Dook 'll giv'ye a half crown. So yer
lordships' honor I givs it just as I was axed to do!'
Here the disguised Tudor Dauling made an awkward bow, and extended
his thickly-gloved hand for the coin he had named. The truth of the story
was, that Dauling and the Jewess were acting in concert. After he had left
the inn in his peasant's frock, with the intention of calling on his father, as his
way lay near the Jew's shop, he thought he would, to test his disguise, stop
and see if Moloch would be able to recognise him. He entered the shop, and
seeing the Jew writing at a low-black desk in one corner, he addressed him,
and priced several articles which Moloch showed to him; for rich as the
money lender was, he did not disdain to wait on the humblest customer, from
whose leathern purse he might possibly transfer a penny to his own iron
coffers
.
While they were thus occupied, Tudor was surprised to see a young man
in a fashionable costume descending the narrow stairs and emerge into the
shop. At a glance he saw that the face was that of the Jew's neicehis own
wife intended! though had he not seen her disguised before as a banker's
clerk and now expected to behold her there, he would not have suspected her
to have been other than she seemeda handsome Jewish youth.
`You are then ready?' said the Moloch, in a low tone, but which he did not
think it of any importance to drop to a whisper before the dull Yorkshire-man.
`I am uncle,' answered Rachel, in the same subdued voice, which, however,
Dauling overheard.
`I tear your plan will fail, and it is besides, a very dangerous one. I wish
you would devise some other.'
This plan, be it said, was that she should in some way gain audience of the
Duke and persuade him to go with her to see his son whom she was to
represent
as dying from a poison administered by himself, on learning that his
father
had the evidences of his forgery. The, Duke, knowing, that Tudor and
himself were the only persons privacy to this fact, would instantly have
credited
her words, and believing she came from his son, would hasten to him.
He was to be driven to a certain dwelling near the Jew's house, and then the
forged draft was to be demanded of him, and if he resisted it was to be taken
from him by threats of death. If he had not the paper with him, he was to be
compelled to write an order, and send Racher (still disguised as a young man)
to his palace with directions how to get it.
Tudor overheard just enough of the conversation between the uncle and
neice, to show him that, as he imagined, some personal violence was
contemplated
against the Duke if he refused their demand. This purpose he was
resolved
should not be carried out; for he was not so lost as to sufler the life of
his father to be put in such peril. He, therefore, abruptly made himself known
to them not a little to their astonishment.
`I have thought of a better way of managing this matter, Moloch,' he said,
after their surprise had a little subsided. `The life and person of the Duke
must be held sacred. I can be a party to no act which affects his personal
liberty.'
`Name your plan, my lort,' said Moloch with a slight frown of displeasure.
`You shall draw a bill for six thousand pounds in my favor, and I will place
my father's acceptance upon it! Date it when you will, but make it to have
matured to-day.'
The Jew regarded him with surprise; but, without heeding him. Tudor
went on to detail the plan which we have already seen so successfully carried
out by the Jewess. His confidence in its being successful was based upon his
belief that the Duke, when he found that there was a second forged draft in
the hands of a Jewish broker, who had the power to cast the maker of it into
prison (but who would decline doing so, if the first draft was given up) would
yield it, although he might be ignorant of the motives which actuated the
Jew's decision; for Tudor well knew the Duke's paternal weakness, and,
although
,
he feared to have him hold in his hands the evidence of his crime, he
felt that it would require circumstances of the most aggravated nature which
would induce his father to make up his mind to surrender him to the Jew's
mercy, and into the stern power of the law.
This plan Moloch approved of, and the bill being made Rachel took it and
proceeded on her mission, though, secure in his disguise, Tudor was desirous
of being himself the messenger to the Duke; for if he, himself, could succeed,
he felt that he should be freed from his pledge to the Jewess. But both
Moloch
and the fair and ambitious Rachel saw this view of the case as well as
he, and as they were playing a deep game, as the reader will yet discover, it
was no part of theirs to relinquish a single advantage they had obtained.
Finding he must yield, Tudor suffered her to depart: and, anxious to ascertain
the result, he soon followed the hackney-coach and waited outside the palace.
`What success?' he asked as the Jewess approached the carriage, looking
over as she walked, an open letter.
`I have obtained it, my lord,' she answered with a look of pleasure. `But
here is something that concerns you! My eye caught your name and the
address
to the king, and thinking you ought to know what the Duke was
communicating
respecting you, I took it up unseen. Perhaps you can understand
it better than I can! You will soon be with my uncle?' she said placing the
letter in his hand and springing into the carriage.
`Yes,' answered Tudor with a sigh at the prospect of losing his liberty to
the Jewess. He felt, for a moment, he had rather have braved the
consequences
of its possession by his father. He now read the letter which she had
placed in his hands and saw at once through the plot which was formed against
him. With quick presence of mind he resolved, favored by his disguise, to
return it at once to the Duke, before he could suspect he could have seen it;
for he knew the conspiracy would not be carried out if it was suspected he
was advised of it; and it was by no means his wish,
now
, that it should be
stopped
CHAPTER IX
The Bride.
Tudor
, satisfied with being able, unsuspected, to restore the letter so soon
to the Duke, who, after questioning him closely was convinced that the young
Jew had taken it by accident and had not had time to read it, now resolved to
leave before he should be detected. But, first to preserve his assumed
character
,
he asked for the half crown.
`Oh, ah! Merton, give the man a crown piece!'
`Come with me, Yorkshire, and I'll give it to you,' said the page, flippantly,
opening the door for him to pass out.
`Good day, yer lordship's honor,' said Dauling making a bow; and then
turning he followed the page into the ante-room, where, after receiving the
money he was about passing out when a lovely child of nine or ten years of
age, came bounding along the hall from a distant drawing-room, her hair
fluttering
about her shoulders like a cloud of golden wings with which she seemed
to flyso light and graceful was her motion. On seeing the supposed
countryman she stopped, and stared upon him with a look of amused surprise;
for the contrast between his coarse dress and the elegance that surrounded him
was ludicrously striking; and it was seldom she had seen so strange a
looking
person in the palace.
`Merton, who is that?' she said, whispering in the page's ear and shrinking
a little behind him while she fixed her large azure eyes upon her disguised
brother; for this lovely child was the lady Mary, the Duke's only daughter,
the heiress of his name and vast domains.
When Tudor beheld her he also stopped. The sight of her gave him both
pleasure and pain! He loved her tenderly as a child and sister, but he could
not reconcile himself to regard with equanimity the high position she enjoyed
and which he felt should be his own! Of late, dark thoughts had been
mingling
with his better feelings towards her as the usurper of his rights; and
only that day he had internally formed a resolution that if he failed to get the
forged draft into his possession, he would, by some stratagem get the child into
his power and hold her as a counterbalance.
The knowledge he had but a few moments before obtained from the
contents
of the Dake's letter to the King had stung him to the soul, and roused in
his heart the most indomitable revenge against his father for thus
treacherously
conspiring against him. The letter had given him a sufficient insight into
the conspirrcy to let him perceive that he was to be taken in a trap; and under
the pretence of conveying a prisoner of state, he was to receive on board his
father, masked as such, and a posse of officers, who in some way were to
compel
him from the realm or arrest him for his forgeries. This information
vaguely seen as its chief features were, was sufficient to place him at once in
an antagonistic position to the Duke; and he had quitted his presence, hiding,
under the assumed awkwardness of his manner, a heart of resolute revenge.
He looked upon his sister now, therefore, with eyes far from affectionate:
for the sight of her renewed all his bitterness against that destiny which had
made him an outcast from the name and house of his father. While he gazed
upon her he had formed a purpose in his mind which he resolved to execute.
Observing that his steady gaze alarmed the child and offended the page, he
turned away and left the Palace.
The Duke, in the meanwhile, remained for some minutes holding the
re-covered
letter in his hand and in deep thought.
`There is no question but that it was taken by accident, or why returned?
The probability is that it was not opened and read. At any rate Tudor has
not seen it, and this person could not have understood anything from itat
least sufficient to gave Tudor any idea of the truth. There was a fairness and
honesty in returning it that leads me to believe it was not read! I will
proceed
,
therefore, as already decided on; and if it should turn out that Tudor
has intimation of our purpose he will not be on board. If he is there I shall
know he is ignorant of the conspiracy against him.'
On leaving the palace the captain of the yacht after exchanging his disguise
at the Inn for his own uniform, took his way to Moloch's. On his arrival there
he was shown into the Jew's private chamber where he found Rachel, who
had resumed her female attire, and was looking more beautiful than he had
ever seen her; for her success had given color to her cheek and brilliancy to
her eyes.
`Well, my lort, you see ve haf te draft,' said Moloch, with a quiet smile of
inward satisfaction gleaming upon his dark features. And he exhibited it to
Tudor as he spoke. Rachel obtained it, the plan you suggested, my lort!'
`Then I have not so much obligation upon me,' said Tudor, wishing to avoid
the marriage.
`My lort must fulfil his opligation,' answered Moloch, coldly and firmly.
`And marry your neice?'
`Yes, my lort!'
`I will give her .'
`What haf you to gif, my lort?' said the Jew, dryly.
`True. I am a beggar! And this is what surprises me! Will you cast her
way upon an adventurer!'
`Such was the compact between us, my lort!'
`And will you consent to sacrifice yourself to such an one as I am, fair
Rachel? Your beauty and fortune will command a match more worthy of
you!'
`I am ready, my lord to fulfil my part of the compact,' said the Jewess,
smiling
and speaking in a way that fascinated Tudor.
`Be it so, then! for while Moloch holds that draft I am in his power! But
you know it is a part of the compact that I leave you with your uncle!'
`I obey, my lord,' answered the noble looking Jewess maiden, casting her
eyes to the floor.
`Nay, I do believe,' said Dauling to himself, I shall take a fancy to be proud
of her and display her to the world! You were to give her a dowry, Moloch?'
`Yes, my lort. I will gif her ten tousant pound now, and py and py, if your
lortship treats her kind, I shall gif her very mootch more monies!'
`Very well, I am content, Moloch. When is it you desire the ceremony
should take place?'
`Now?'
`In the Jewish form?'
`Both in the Jewish and christian form,' answered Moloch, firmly.
`You mean to bind me closely, I see! Well, I am ready!'
`Your lortship will please sign dis paper?' said Moloch, placing a
formidable
looking parchment before him.
`What is this?'
`Let my lort read it!'
`Why this is folly! I, promise and bind myself to settle the yearly annuity
of twenty thousand pounds upon my wife Rachel during the length of her
natural life! I am not worth a groat.'
`Will you sign it?'
`You jest!'
`My lort will please sign it, and I will then transfer to you this check for
ten thousand pounds her dowry!'
`But I can never pay it.'
`That is no matters, my lort.'
`But what can be your motive?'
`To let my Jewish friends believe I have married my neice well. I care
not whether your lordship pays a groat of it, nor do I expect it.'
`Well, I'll do it,' said Dauling with a light laugh; and taking the pen he
was about to sign it when Moloch arrested his hand and said,
`Wait, the witnesses, my lort.' He rung a little bell and an inner door
opened and two Jews entered, followed by two citizens of London. `There
are the witnesses my lort.'
`I care not if there were a score of them, Moloch. The instrument would
be of no higher worth!' As he spoke he affixed, in a bold hand, his signature
to the settlement.
`Vill your lortship please add pelow te name.
son of the Duke of
'
`With pleasure, Moloch: and cousin to the king, if you like it.'
`No, the first part is enough, my lort.'
`There it is! I congratulate you, Moloch, on your alliance with so
distinguished
a person.'
This was spoken in a light, ironical manner. Moloch made no reply but
again touched the bell and a Jewish Priest entered in his robes and the
ceremony
of marriage was performed by him, Tudor wearing a reckless smile upon
his face, the Jewess grave and yet with a quiet look of pride and triumph that
he was at a loss to explain under the circumstances. After the priest had
retired
the bell was again rung and a magistrate entered and performed the
ceremony after the form of the Established Church. The two Jews and two
citizens affixed their names to the certificates as witnesses of both.
`Now, venerable uncle mine,' said the bridegroom after the three were once
more left alone, this matter being arranged, I trust to your satisfaction and
that of my beautiful bride, I will, with your permission take my draft and
destroy
it!'
Moloch placed it in his hand, when Tudor tearing it in pieces deliberately
consumed the fragments in the flame of the lamp, saying,
`Thus perish the last evidence of my crime.'
`You forget the draft which Rachel took to the bank!' said Moloch with a
smile.
`True! But that I am not interested in. This is the Duke's affair; who
will be at no loss on whom to fix the act after what has occurred. But he can
bring no proof against me in this case! But I have something to say to you,
Moloch touching the Duke; for the letter you gave me fair bride, was full of
information that was needful to me.'
Tudor then related the discovery he had made and signified his intention of
receiving the Duke and his party as if nothing had occurred; and keeping
clear of the frigate hold them in his own power! But you look thoughtful
Moloch! Do you oppose this scheme?'
`I do, my lort,' answered the Jew with a dignity of decision in his manner,
that struck Dauling.
`Name your objections, Moloch! You know I am now my father's deadly
foe. I have detected him in a treacherous plot against, perhaps, my
life!
and
I mean to take him and his accomplices in the snare he is setting for me!'
`My lort'
`Have done with your eternal, my lort! I am no lord, Jew, and I always
think you call me so in mockery. Mister me, man,
mister
me!'
The Jew and his neice interchanged a secret look, and a quiet smile passed
over the face of the latter. Dauling did not observe it.
`I have one request to make of you, then,
Mister
Dauling,' said the Jew
impressively
.
`Name it quickly; for I must at once be on board. It is already dark. I am
impatient to get into my lord Duke's trap! A states' prisoner hey!
Prisoner
he shall be at any rate.'
`Will my lort hear me?'
`Mister Dauling will hear thee! go on!' said the Captain of the Yacht
impatiently
;
for he had already risen and without seeming to think of his new
bride, had advanced toward the door to open it and depart.
`Before you go on this affair,
I
must see the Duke!'
`You!' exclaimed Dauling with astonishment.
`Yes, my lort! I wish to see him in person and have a few words of
conversation
with him.'
`To what end? He is by this time at the Tower waiting for me to put my
feet into the snare, both he and the King have set for me.'
Moloch was silent a few moments and seemed to be closely meditating upon
some course of action. Suddenly his face lighted up with that expression of
satisfaction which comes upon the countenance when a happy idea has been
struck upon. Turning to his neice he addressed her a few words in Hebrew.
She made no reply save by an answering look of intelligence and then crossing
over to her husband she laid her hand upon his arm and looking up into his
face with an eloquent gaze of tenderness, said,
`Tudor, my noble lord, let me, your wife, ask a first favor of you, and I beg
you will not refuse it.'
`Speak, Rachel,' he said, looking down upon her beautiful face and into her
deep, dark eyes which charmed his own, `speak and I will grant it; for I
begin
to feel that I have a wife whom yet, perhaps, I may both love and feel
proud of! What have thy pretty lips to utter?'
`Promise me that you will stay here with my uncle until my return!'
`Whither do you go?'
`But a short hour's absence.'
`Do you not know I can controul your movements now, fair wife? Thou
hast not asked thy leige lord; for faith I am thy lord if no body's else,' he
said laughing. `But thou shalt not go unless I know where and for what!'
`Thou shalt know on my return.'
`Truly, I dare say. It is a ruse to keep me from my yacht. You would save
the duke from the punishment I have in store for him!' His countenance
darkened
with displeasure as he uttered this suspicion.
`You are right, my lord,' said she firmly. `I wish to convev a message to
the duke to meet you here!'
`To meet me here?'
`Yes, Tudor.'
`For what purpose?'
`That my uncle will tell you during my absence.'
Dauling looked inquiringly at the Jew, who was busily writing a note, and
said,
`Explain this matter, Moloch?'
`It is af the greatest importance, my lort, to your happiness and interests,'
said the Jew, `that you do not go to your yacht before seeing the duke. If I
knew he was at his palace I would at once go to him there; but, as it is, I must
try and get him here. Go, Rachel, with this note and be diligent and wise in
the execution of this mission, as it is the last you will do by my command.'
Ere Dauling could arrest her progress she was out of the room. He would have
followed her, but the hand of the money-lender was laid firmly upon his wrist.
`She must go, my lort. Sit down and hear what I have to tell! It concerns
both thee and thy sister!' Moloch then locked the door and removed the key.
`Ha! what have you strange about her or me that you take this course to
compel me to listen?'
`Be seated, my lort, and you shall hear!'
`Moloch, if you detain me so that thereby I lose my revenge on the Duke
for his treachery, your life shall answer for it!'
`Your lortship shall take my life freely, if I do not show you goot reasons
for all dis,' answered the Jew smiling.
`Then say what thou hast to say,' cried Tudor throwing himself into a chair;
`I have given my word to thy neice, now my wife, that I will wait her return.
I believe you are my friend, Moloch, and I will hear what you have to reveal.'
Leaving the Jew to make known to Dauling the extraordinary facts, which
will soon be given to the reader, we shall proceed to the Tower, in a room in
which, over-looking the Dock, sat the Duke, Sir John Trenly the keeper, and
others. The window commanded a view of the yacht, which was seen through
the dim twilight, at anchor off the stairs, and in perfect order for sea. The
Duke was in his ordinary attire, but near him upon a table lay a cloak and a
mask, under which, in the character of a State's Prisoner, he intended to go
passenger in the yacht.
`It is getting late, your grace,' said Sir John, who had been sworn in as a
party to this conspiracy. `Will Tudor be here think ye?'
`Unless he has got intimation of our purpose. The King believes that the
letter was taken intentionally, was read and that the facts in it were verbally
conveyed by the person to him. This is very probable. Ah, here comes a
soldier from the gate, Sir John, bea ing a note.
`It is addressed to your grace, said the Knight receiving it at the door and
handing it to the Duke.
The Duke tore the seal, and read as follows:
`My lord,
The writer has positive evidence that the plot you have arranged
for the purpose of banishing your son from England, is known to him through
means of a letter taken from your table to-day. In a word, the person who
returned the letter to you was no other than your son, lord Tudor, disguised
as a peasant. He returned the letter to lull all suspicions of his having
learned
the contents. His object in being in disguise near your palace was to get
early intelligence respecting the fate of the forged draft your grace held!
From what I have written above, your grace will perceive I am acquainted
with the circumstances that interest you, and that I am also your friend. Will
your grace, therefore grant the writer an interview, as the writer has a
subject
of great importance to make known, deeply affecting the interests of
both
of the children of your grace. If your grace will return with the bearer who
is provided with a coach, to the abode of the writer, he will be able to give
information to your grace of the deepest moment to his happiness. If
your-grace
declines (under the seeming mystery of the circumstances) to trust your
self with the bearer, to be conveyed to the writer's abode, the writer will wait
on his grace at his own palace at eight o'clock, this evening.'
The note bore neither date nor signature. Yet, after a moment's reflection,
the Duke resolved to comply with the request contained in it; and being a
bold man, fears of personal violence by entrusting himself with strangers he
knew not where, did not occur to him to cause him to waver in his
determination
.
Informing, sir John, briefly, that the plot had been discovered and
dismissing
his accomplices, the Duke left the tower alone, passed out of the gate
and found a hackney-coach in waiting.
`Do you go with me, my lord?' said a voice he instantly recognised as that
of the handsome Jewish youth, as he approached a muffled figure standing by it.
`Then this letter came then, from
you!
' said his grace, firmly.
`No, my lord, I am but its bearer! My father, the Jew, wrote it.'
`I am glad to meet you again! I hope these mysteries will be now solved
by you or by the Jew, thy father! Enter, I go with thee!'
CHAPTER X.
The Signet.
`
What
street is this?' demanded the Duke as they alighted beneath a lamp
at the door of the money-lender's shop.
`Monmouth street, your grace,' answered Rachel. `This is my father's
abode.'
`True. I should have known that, being a Jew, he should live in
Monmouth
street. Now go in, young man, and I will follow thee: but beware of
treachery, for see you I am not without means of defence;' and the nobleman
touched lightly with his finger the hilt of his sword, an appendage worn at that
day by every private gentleman.
`Nay, thou wilt have no cause for drawing thy sword here, my lord! Stoop,
my lord, for the ceiling is low.'
`'Tis a dark stair way this,' said the Duke to himself, instinctively taking
his sword into his hand, yet going boldly up after her.
`It will be lighter soon, my lord,' she said as she struck upon the door at
the landing. It was opened by Moloch in person. The chamber was brightly
lighted by wax candles in massive silver stands, and the Duke stood still,
surprised
by the luxury and elegance of the apartment, so widely contrasting the
shop through which he had come. He then fixed his eyes on the dark
Israelitish
face of Moloch, its high, bold features and strong lines, strengthened by
the manner in which the light fell upon his head. There was something in
the Jew's appearance that seemed to impress tho Duke with strange interest,
for he fixed his gaze upon him steadily for a few seconds, as if recalling some
painful recognition.
`My lord Duke, I am happy to have this honor,' said Moloch in a manner at
once haughty and deferential. `My poor threshold is seldom crossed by such
noble guests. Be seated, your grace.'
Still the Duke stood surveying him without removing his eyes from his face.
Moloch turned his head and addressing a few words in Hebrew to Rachel, she
retired leaving the two alone.
`You sent me this letter, Jew,' said the Duke, inquiringly, holding it out in
his hand.
`I did, my lort Duke!'
`You are a Jewish broker?'
`Such is my profession, your grace. Will your lortship do me the honor to
pe seated?'
`No, I have no leisure. If you possess interesting information, you darkly
hint at in this letter, I am here to hear it; but first I would ask you what
common
bond of interest exists in common between you and my unfortunate
son! you a money-lender and he a gaming spendthrift without money or
manor?'
`You shall learn my lort Duke! Thy son is my nephew-in-law!' gave the
Jew answer in an even tone of voice while his eyes watched the impression
his words made,
`Thy nephew? How is this?'
`He ish wedded to mine neice!'
`Tudor Dauling wedded to a Jewess!'
`No less, my lort. He has this day taken to wife a daughter of the race of
Abraham!'
`Jew! dost thou speak the truth?'
`I do, your Grace. Behold here de instrument which confirms it!'
The Duke looked at the certificate and his face became pale as the
confirmation
of the truth pressed upon him.
`This disturbs thee, my lort,' said Moloch, speaking very slightly in his
Jewish dialect as he commenced with the noble; `I did suppose it mattered
little to thee whom he wedded, Jew or Gentile?'
`But a Jewess!'
`Was the mother of thy Christ!'
`That my blood should thus be degraded;' not heeding this reproof of his
prejudices: `I would have cared less had he been hanged!
`My lort he vould haf been hanged iv he did not marry her; put for me he
would never have got out of the dangerous situations he put himself in!'
`To save him from the gallows you have married him to your neice?'
`And I gave her a dowry of ten thousand pounds! It was worth that to
wed a Duke's son!' added Moloch with a peculiar expression.
`Thou art the first Jew I ever knew to be guilty of a folly! Didst thou
include
the six thousand pounds which you advanced him on the forged draft
which I tore up in the presence of your son?' asked the Duke with a sneer.
`No, my lort!'
`Thy neice and thy money are both thrown away. Henceforth Tudor may
go his own way to infamy and death. I will, henceforth, be regardless of his
honor; for he who will stoop so low as to wed a Jewess, has no honor worth
possessing!'
`Your grace loves not the race of Apraham!'
`No.'
`I knew this well!' responded the Jew, and partly for this did I urge this
union; but there were other and deeper motives as you shall see.'
`The motive must have been deep to lead you to give your neice (if she
were fair, or even of common worth) to an outcast, when you had no prospect
of gain, but every thing to lose.'
`My neice was fair, and of worth as your grace, shall, ere long, satisfy
yourself. She was very dear to me, as my own daughter, and therefore I
sought for her this match!'
`A poor prize has she won in the lottery of marriage. But if she be but
half as fair to the eye, and but a tenth part so clever in intellect and
education
as thy son, then Tudor's choice need not so much to be wondered at, as
thine own and hers. Did she marry him willingly?'
`Willingly, my lort, Duke!'
`Knowing all his vices?'
`All, my lort!'
`Then thou art a fool, Jew, and she a fool's neice, and I wish you both
great comfort with your hymeneal acquisition. Now, if thou hast no more
than this to reveal, I will leave thee, thanking thee for thy news; for, by our
Heaven! it is rare and needeth thanks.
`You are bitter and ironical, my lort. Have I not done thee service in
warning
thee not to adventure in the yacht!'
`True, and for this you place me under obligations,' said the Duke in a
more natural tone. `But' he added in a sarcastic way, `what is thy purpose
with thy noble-blooded nephew? Dost thou mean to teach him the mystery
of money-getting! By the mass I would like to see him when he is
well-taught
!'
`Your grace is pleased to be facetious,' said Moloch with singular calmness
yet compressing his lips as if the calmness were forced! `Your grace has a
daughter?' he added abruptly.
`Well, what is thy purpose in naming this fact?' said the Duke with
surprise
.
`You love her!' continued the Jew, in the same even tone.
`I do! What danger menaces her?' he asked in alarm, impressed by the
money-lender's manner, with some apprehension of evil to her.
`Which would your grace prefer, should inherit your name and rank, and
wide domain? thy daughter or thy son?'
`This is a strange question, Jew!'
`I would know if you had choice between them in your heart!'
The child is dear to me, but not dearer than Tudor once was, and still
would have been but for his conduct! But what is this to do with the matter.
I asked you what your purpose was with your son, nephew-in-law! for
although
he has forfeited my love, still I feel an interest in him still! Besides, I
would like to know the hidden mystery of this strange union. What deeper
purpose than I can fathom has your sagacity at heart?' asked the Duke,
haughtily
.
`Dost thou hope I will pay thee a large sum of money to keep this
marriage
a secret? If this is thy hope, Jew, thou art deceived. I have been weak,
but henceforth I leave Tudor to his own self-shaped destinies!'
`I will explain to your grace, my purpose in bringing about this marriage,
which has been for years on my heart; and to which very end I have
educated
my neice!'
`Educated her to be the wife of Tudor Dauling?'
`Yes, my lord Duke. From her tenth year, her education has been
directed
with this ultimate object. Tudor knew not of itnay, he saw her himself
but lately; but on him I have kept my eye steadily till the hour for the
consummation
of my wishes should arrive!
`This is strange language and incomprehensible,' said the Duke, with
interest
in his looks. `I see you have something still to unfold. Proceed; I
will hear this riddle out!'
`My lord duke here is the key to the solution,' said Moloch, taking from a
casket and placing in his hand a signet ring. On receiving it the Duke's face
changed color, and with a trembling hand he quickly brought it close to his
eyes as if to confirm by some secret mark the recognition he had made.
`Wherewherehow did you come by this ring?' he asked with broken
words; for the sight of it had produced an extraordinary impression upon him.
`Does my lord Duke remember thirty-seven years ago when a student at
Oxford, striking a Jew?' asked Moloch, slowly, and fixing his dark, Arabian
eyes upon the face of the nobleman.
`I dowert
thou
then that Jew?' demanded the nobleman.
`I am, my lord Duke. You was with a party of merry companions, and
meeting me in the suburbs of the University, struck me because I refused to
take off my hat to a guide post in the form of a cross that stood at the corner
of two ways, and say `Jesus is the Christ.
`Well!' said the Duke impatiently.
`I never forgave the blow, my lord!'
`I care not for thy forgiveness, Jew,' answered the Duke, haughtily. `What
about this signet which I hold?'
`You shall know,' began the Jew; but we omit his dialect in the narrative
he is about to give. `I threatened to be avenged of you. I followed you day
and night to have an opportunity that would be safe to myself. I was your
shadow unseen. I discovered your visits to the daughter of a poor baronet
and followed you there, I overheard from an arbour where I watched an
opportunity
to strike you to the heart, I overheard your pledge to wed her! I
heard you give it under the partly assumed name of
Henry Tudor
Dauling.
You start! But listen patiently, for I will soon be done with what I have to
say. I, alone, knew your true rank and name to be Henry Tudor, Duke of
! I went to the country priest whom I overheard you mention as the
person
to unite you to your victim; for I had planned a new sort of vengeance.
I told the good man your intention of coming to his rustic church in the
evening
to be united to the lovely girl who believed you to be sincere. I told him
that he must deceive the false nobleman in his wicked purposes. He consented
without bribe or reward, for he felt it was an act of duty to prevent a fictitious
marriage under a false name. He, therefore, prepared the certificates, with
your
true name and title!
my lord duke. You were married under your true
name of Henry as was your wife under hers! The priest had prepared the
church record in the same manner as the certificate, omitting the name of
`Dauling.' Before asking you to sign this, the clergyman, you remember,
asked you for your signet to annex also. You drew it from your finger without
thinking, but had hardly got it off when you seemed to recollect that it would
betray you, therefore you suffered it to fly off from your finger as if by
accident
,
to a distant part of the shadowy aisle. `No matter about the signet,'
you said quickly. `Let me sign the record.' It was handed to you! The
priest closely watched your pen, and when you had ended the name of Tudor,
he let the record book fall as if by accident, the lights were also knocked over
by it and the church was left in darkness!
You did not delay to search for your ring, but telling the priest falsely that
it was one you had bought of a Jew, you desired him, if he found it, to send it
to you at such a place. You then groped your way from the church, too
conscious
of having in your heart performed a wicked part towards your fair young
wife, to think about completing your name, and unsuspecting the consequences
that might result from it! Your signet was found and now is in your grace's
hands! On the record of the village church of Hamersley your grace will find
recorded the marriage of Henry Tudor with her whom he believed he was only
making his mistress. There were two witnesses also present, my lord, who
knew you well and whom I called for the purpose of bearing testimony to your
nuptials and identifying you as the young Duke of. Thus, your grace,
will see that you were the lawful husband (contrary to your wishes had
suspicions
)
of the baronet's daughter, and that your son Tudor Dauling is the
legimate heir to your title, name and rank. These facts being thus known to
me, I being the chief agent in producing them, I resolved that I would not take
your life for the blow, but suffer you to live, for I was partly avenged by the
success of my stratagem, and by and by take advantage as circumstances
should offer of my knowledge and power. Your wife gave birth to a son and
soon after died. I watched his growth and as he grew up to youthful years my
thoughts were daily upon him and also upon your grace. I could not decide
how I should best avail myself of my power. At length my brother died,
leaving an only daughter to my guardianship. She was beautiful, intelligent,
and soon became attached to me. My long conceived plans now suddenly
assumed shape and tangibility. I resolved, that I would educate her to become
the wife of the supposed bastard. But I will not detail the steps which I took.
The result of my success, your grace, is already fully aware! The neice of the
money-lender Moloch, is the daughter-in-law of the haughty Duke of
and a peeress of the realm of England.
It would be impossible to convey any adequate idea of the emotions with
which the confounded and astonished nobleman listened to this developement
of facts, for facts he felt convinced they were. Moloch sat a few minutes,
closely watching his pale countenance and silently enjoying his revenge; for
if ever one human being had worked out the full meed of vengeance against
another, Moloch the Jew was certainly the man. The Duke sat transfixed,
and immoveable, with an expression upon his face as if going over the past in
his thoughts. At length he sprung to his feet! A smile that perplexed Moloch
passed across his mouth as he said quickly,
`Prove me this, Jew!'
`Thy marriage?'
`Yes. Prove it me that it is as you say!'
`Here are the proofs, your grace,' answered the Jew, laying before him certain
papers.
The Duke examined them and saw that there could no longer be any doubt
as they were regularly made out certificates of the clergyman and witnesses
that Henry Tudor, Duke of  had been lawfully joined in wedlock to
Mary  the daughter of Sir George Healey, knight.
`Does my son know this?' asked the Duke hoarsely.
`I do, my noble father,' answered Tudor advancing from the recess. I
kneel for a father's blessing, and do here upon my bended knee solemnly
objure
and cast off my follies and crimes to which the force of circumstances
had driven me, and will henceforth be thy loving son, and seek by a life of
integrity and honor to be worthy of the proud name and rank I inherit.'
The Duke gazed upon him at first coldly, and then tenderly embraced him:
`Tudor,' said he with deep emotion, `I am not sorry that this thing has
happened
,
as it proves to be, it has relieved my soul from a heavy weight which
my intended injustice to your sainted mother has cast upon it. I tenderly
loved
her, and I have loved you for her sake; and for her sake I forgive you the
past and acknowledge you as my son. Moloch I can thank thee for thy
stratagem
.
Thy revenge hath been turned aside from the mark like an arrow
ill-shot
!'
`Nay, does your grace forget in thy joy at recovering, and son of thy name
that he has a Jew's daughtera despised daughter of Israel for his bride
whom thou must acknowledge too!'
'Tis too true!' answered the Duke, turning pale at the recollection. `Alas,
Tudor, that this discovery had not been made earlier, and I had found thee
free from this debasing alliance! The Jew hath his revenge!'
`But that he had wedded my niece, your grace, the secret would have been
still a secret. I have revealed it only for the sake of this alliance, by which
my revenge would humble you!'
`Let me behold thy wife!' said his grace, sadly and sternly.
The duke started back with surprise and pleasure as he beheld not only a
woman of matchless beauty, but recognised in her the features and expression
of the Jewish youth he had taken such interest in.
`Your beauty and dignity placed eloquently in defence of your birth and
race,' said the Duke as he advanced and took her hand. `I see I must needs
compromise this matter and accept thee for my daughter; for by the rood!
thou hast a face and person that would have graced the throne of thy
country-woman
,
Queen Esther! Be, henceforth, a daughter to me, and I will be to
thee a father!'
Touched with this generous reception, Rachel knelt at his feet to implore
his pardon for having taken part to injure him, but raising her up he kissed her
cheek and leading her to Tudor, said
`Take her, my sonand wear her close to thy heart; for she is a jewel worthy
of thy high position. Moloch,' he added, smiling proudly and turning
towards
the perplexed and astonished money-lender, `Moloch where is now thy
revenge!'
`Thou hast conquered it, my nople Duke,' answered Moloch overcome with
surprise and admiration.
Tudor Dauling was publicly acknowledged by the Duke to be his legitimate
son and heir, and when he appeared at Court, the grace and beauty of the
Jewess was the theme of every tongue. Lord Tudor reformed his life and
character and the lovely Israelite made him a devoted wife. His sister, lady
Mary, in due time, wedded Captain, Lord Percy of the navy, a gentleman
whom the reader has already known something of as the middy who slipped
the cables of the Thames barge and did all that mischief which in the end
resulted so happily for all the personages of our story.
THE END.Queen's Yacht
,
Tower-Dock
,
7 A. M.
`May it please your majesty, it is with regret I have to inform your
majesty
that in consequence of an accident which last night occurred to the yacht
by the carelessness of a coal-barge skipper, whereby my bowsprit was carried
away and other damage done which it will take three or four days to repair,
it is out of my power to render obedience to your majesty's commands last
night received. I await your majesty's further pleasure.
I am your majesty's very humble servant and subject,
TUDOR DAULING,
Commander of the Queen's Yacht
.`To His most gracious majesty,
Sire,
I shall depart in one hour for the
Tower
and go on board, or rather, be
taken, en masque
as
the
prisoner of state, on
board the yacht with my party of Police-men! Sir John informs me that the
repairs are already completed, and that the schooner will be ready to sail, down
the river with the first turn of the tide. Then getting Tudor to anchor under
the guns of the frigate at the mouth, we can dictate our own terms to him!
Tudor has not yet been on board; but I have ascertained that he made his
appearance
at the Bank at noon and called for the draft holding the amount in
notes in his open pocket-book. The cashier who suspects nothing, voluntarily
informed me as I entered the banking-house, that he had come to take up the
draft, not
knowing
that it was paid already. `When I told him that your grace
had taken it up in person,' said the banker to me, `he said that it was all very
well; that you had given him the funds to take it up, as he was coming into
town, not expecting to be in London yourself!'
`You see here my liege, Tudor's self-possession and readiness of invention;
for he must, undoubtedly have been taken by surprise on finding the draft in
my possession, yet he seems to have manifested none; at least nothing to
attract
the attention of the banker or rouse his suspicions. Since then I am
ignorant
of Tudor's movements. Once get him on board and down the river,
and I think he will rather set sail for distant lands, than return a prisoner in
the hands of Bow-street officers. Should he not appear at the Dock this
evening
,
I shall promptly advise your majesty.
I am your majesty's very humble servant and cousin,
Edward
.`My lord,
The writer has positive evidence that the plot you have arranged
for the purpose of banishing your son from England, is known to him through
means of a letter taken from your table to-day. In a word, the person who
returned the letter to you was no other than your son, lord Tudor, disguised
as a peasant. He returned the letter to lull all suspicions of his having
learned
the contents. His object in being in disguise near your palace was to get
early intelligence respecting the fate of the forged draft your grace held!
From what I have written above, your grace will perceive I am acquainted
with the circumstances that interest you, and that I am also your friend. Will
your grace, therefore grant the writer an interview, as the writer has a
subject
of great importance to make known, deeply affecting the interests of
both
of the children of your grace. If your grace will return with the bearer who
is provided with a coach, to the abode of the writer, he will be able to give
information to your grace of the deepest moment to his happiness. If
your-grace
declines (under the seeming mystery of the circumstances) to trust your
self with the bearer, to be conveyed to the writer's abode, the writer will wait
on his grace at his own palace at eight o'clock, this evening.'